Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 12 TLSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 PROPERTY TAX REVENUE LIMITATIONS ââ BOND REVENUE USE 2 LIMITATIONS 3 Section 1. Section 11.11, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 11.11 Scope of audits. 6 The written report of the audit of a governmental 7 subdivision shall include the auditorâs opinion as to whether a 8 governmental subdivisionâs financial statements are presented 9 fairly in all material respects in conformity with generally 10 accepted accounting principles or with an other another 11 comprehensive basis of accounting. As a part of conducting an 12 audit of a governmental subdivision, an evaluation of internal 13 control and tests for compliance with laws and regulations 14 shall be performed. As part of conducting an audit of a 15 governmental subdivision, an examination of the governmental 16 subdivisionâs compliance with the reporting requirements of 17 section 331.403, subsection 3 , or section 384.22, subsection 2 , 18 if applicable, shall be performed. As part of conducting an 19 audit of a governmental subdivision for fiscal years beginning 20 on or after July 1, 2027, an examination of the governmental 21 subdivisionâs compliance with section 24.35 shall be performed, 22 including verification of the circumstances resulting in actual 23 reserve funds exceeding the specified limits. 24 Sec. 2. Section 24.34, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 24.34 Unliquidated obligations. 27 A city, county, or other political subdivision governmental 28 entity, as defined in section 24.35, may establish an 29 encumbrance system for any obligation not liquidated at the 30 close of the fiscal year in which the obligation has been 31 encumbered assigned, committed, restricted, or specified as 32 nonspendable . The encumbered obligations may be retained upon 33 the books of the city, county, or other political subdivision 34 until liquidated, all in accordance with generally accepted 35 -1- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 1/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ governmental accounting practices principles, as established by 1 the governmental accounting standards board . 2 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 24.35 General fund reserves ââ 3 limitations. 4 1. For purposes of this section: 5 a. âBudget yearâ is the fiscal year beginning during the 6 calendar year in which a budget is certified. 7 b. âCurrent fiscal yearâ is the fiscal year ending during 8 the calendar year in which a budget for the budget year is 9 certified. 10 c. âGeneral fundâ means a governmental entityâs fund 11 designated as such by law or the governmental entityâs fund 12 from which primary general operations of the governmental 13 entity are funded. 14 d. âGovernmental entityâ means any unit of government 15 or other public body or public corporation, including any 16 intergovernmental entity, that has the power to impose or 17 certify a property tax levy. âGovernmental entityâ does not 18 include a school district. 19 e. âUnassignedâ means funds that are not restricted, 20 committed, assigned, or nonspendable within the meaning of 21 generally accepted accounting principles, as established by the 22 governmental accounting standards board. 23 2. a. For budgets certified for budget years beginning 24 on or after July 1, 2027, proposed unassigned reserve funds 25 identified within a governmental entityâs general fund shall 26 not exceed an amount equal to ten percent of the budgeted 27 expenditures from the governmental entityâs general fund for 28 the current fiscal year prior to budgeted transfers from such 29 general fund. 30 b. If the governmental entityâs budget does not comply with 31 the requirements of paragraph âaâ , the department of management 32 shall not certify the governmental entityâs taxes back to the 33 county auditor under section 24.17 and the governmental entity 34 shall remedy the violation and recertify the budget. 35 -2- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 2/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 3. To ensure uniformity, accuracy, and efficiency in the 1 certification of governmental entity budgets according to the 2 requirements of this section, the department of management 3 shall prescribe the procedures to be used and instruct the 4 appropriate officials of the various governmental entities on 5 implementation of the procedures. 6 Sec. 4. Section 24.48, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The authority to suspend property tax 9 levy limitations under this section shall not apply to the 10 limitations of section 444.25, except for the reasons specified 11 under subsection 1, paragraph âbâ or âcâ . 12 Sec. 5. Section 176A.8, subsection 13, Code 2026, is amended 13 by striking the subsection. 14 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 444.25 Maximum property tax levy 15 dollars. 16 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 17 otherwise requires: 18 a. âBudget yearâ is the fiscal year beginning during the 19 calendar year in which a budget is certified. 20 b. âCurrent fiscal yearâ is the fiscal year ending during 21 the calendar year in which a budget for the budget year is 22 certified. 23 c. âGovernmental entityâ means any unit of government 24 or other public body or public corporation, including any 25 intergovernmental entity or special purpose district, that 26 has the power to impose or certify a property tax levy. 27 âGovernmental entityâ does not include a school district. 28 d. âNew valuationâ means the increase from the current 29 fiscal year to the budget year in taxable valuation, as shown 30 on the assessment roll due to the following, the amount of each 31 as reported under section 331.510 by the county auditor to the 32 department of management: 33 (1) New construction. 34 (2) Additions or improvements to existing structures that 35 -3- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 3/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ are not normal and necessary repairs under section 441.21, 1 subsection 8. 2 (3) Net boundary adjustments, including annexation, 3 severance, incorporation, consolidation, or discontinuance as 4 those terms are defined in section 368.1. 5 e. âProperty tax levyâ means each ad valorem property tax 6 authorized by law to be imposed by a governmental entity, but 7 excluding any levy the revenue from which is specified by law 8 for debt service or required to be used exclusively for the 9 repayment of bonds or other indebtedness. The levy under 10 section 384.1, subsection 2, on tracts of land and improvements 11 thereon used and assessed for agricultural or horticultural 12 purposes, shall be considered a separate property tax levy 13 under this section. 14 2. a. (1) For the budget year beginning July 1, 2027, and 15 each budget year thereafter, the maximum aggregate amount of 16 property tax dollars that may be certified for levy among all 17 property tax levies imposed by a governmental entity shall not 18 exceed an amount equal to the sum of one hundred two percent 19 of the aggregate amount of property tax dollars certified for 20 levy by the governmental entity among all property tax levies 21 imposed by the governmental entity for the current fiscal year 22 plus the sum of the new valuation growth amount for each of the 23 governmental entityâs property tax levies for the budget year. 24 (2) The new valuation growth amount for each property tax 25 levy is equal to the product of the following: 26 (a) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 27 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 28 two percent of the aggregate amount of property tax dollars 29 certified for the levy by the governmental entity for the 30 current fiscal year divided by the remainder of the total 31 assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the property 32 tax levy within the governmental entity for the budget year 33 minus value attributable to new valuation. 34 (b) The amount of assessed value used to calculate such 35 -4- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 4/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ taxes for the property tax levy within the governmental entity 1 for the budget year attributable to new valuation. 2 b. If the budget year includes a voter-approved property tax 3 levy that was not approved for imposition in the current fiscal 4 year, the maximum aggregate amount of property tax dollars for 5 the governmental entity under paragraph âaâ for the budget 6 year shall be increased by the amount of the voter approved 7 property tax levy approved at election for the budget year. If 8 the current fiscal year includes a voter-approved property tax 9 levy that is not approved for imposition in the budget year, 10 the maximum aggregate amount of property tax dollars for the 11 governmental entity under paragraph âaâ for the budget year 12 shall be reduced by the amount of the voter approved property 13 tax levy for the current fiscal year. 14 c. The amount of property tax dollars calculated under this 15 section includes those amounts budgeted by the governmental 16 entity as replacement taxes under chapter 437A or 437B, if 17 applicable. 18 3. For purposes of this section, if the governmental 19 entityâs taxes for a property tax levy were not certified 20 back by the department of management under section 24.17 for 21 the current fiscal year due to an act or omission of the 22 governmental entity, the current fiscal yearâs property tax 23 dollars certified for levy for that property tax levy shall 24 be equal to the amount certified for levy for the fiscal year 25 immediately preceding the current fiscal year. 26 4. If a governmental entity certifies a budget that violates 27 this section, the department of management shall reduce each of 28 the applicable governmental entityâs property tax levies on a 29 pro rata basis so that the governmental entity is in compliance 30 with this section. 31 5. This section shall not be construed as removing or 32 otherwise affecting the property tax limitations, including 33 levy rate and use limitations, otherwise provided by law for 34 any property tax levy of the governmental entity. 35 -5- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 5/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 444.26 Use of bonds and indebtedness 1 for general operations ââ prohibition. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âGeneral operationsâ means services or activities 4 generally funded from the governmental entityâs general fund, 5 which are necessary for the operation of the governmental 6 entity, including salaries and benefits, or which are for the 7 health and welfare of the governmental entityâs citizens or 8 primarily intended to benefit all residents of the governmental 9 entity, but excluding services financed by statutory funds 10 other than a debt service fund. 11 b. âGovernmental entityâ means any unit of government 12 or other public body or public corporation, including any 13 intergovernmental entity, that has the power to impose or 14 certify a property tax levy. 15 2. On or after July 1, 2026, the governing body of a 16 governmental entity shall not issue bonds or other indebtedness 17 payable from an ad valorem property tax levy for the purpose of 18 funding the general operations of the governmental entity or 19 otherwise use proceeds from the sale of bonds or issuance of 20 other indebtedness to fund general operations. 21 3. The department of management, following consultation 22 with the city finance committee and the county finance 23 committee, may adopt rules under chapter 17A for governmental 24 entities to implement this section. 25 DIVISION II 26 COMMERCIAL AND INDUSTRIAL PROPERTY ASSESSMENT LIMITATIONS 27 Sec. 8. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph b, 28 subparagraph (2), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), Code 29 2026, are amended to read as follows: 30 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 31 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 32 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 33 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 34 exceed one two hundred fifty thousand dollars. 35 -6- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 6/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value 1 of the property for that assessment year that exceeds one two 2 hundred fifty thousand dollars. 3 Sec. 9. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph c, 4 subparagraph (2), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), Code 5 2026, are amended to read as follows: 6 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 7 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 8 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 9 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 10 exceed one two hundred fifty thousand dollars. 11 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value 12 of the property for that assessment year that exceeds one two 13 hundred fifty thousand dollars. 14 Sec. 10. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph e, 15 subparagraphs (1), (2), and (3), Code 2026, are amended to read 16 as follows: 17 (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, there 18 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 19 department of revenue the sum of one hundred twenty-two million 20 three hundred fifty thousand dollars to be used for payments 21 under this paragraph calculated as a result of the assessment 22 limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), 23 subparagraph division (a), and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), 24 subparagraph division (a). For each fiscal year beginning 25 on or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2027, there 26 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 27 department of revenue the sum of one hundred twenty-five 28 million dollars to be used for payments under this paragraph 29 calculated as a result of the assessment limitations imposed 30 under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division 31 (a), and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division 32 (a). 33 (2) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, but 34 before July 1, 2027, each county treasurer shall be paid by the 35 -7- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 7/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ department of revenue an amount calculated under subparagraph 1 (4) for the applicable fiscal year . If an amount appropriated 2 for the fiscal year is insufficient to make all payments as 3 calculated under subparagraph (4), the director of revenue 4 shall prorate the payments to the county treasurers and shall 5 notify the county auditors of the pro rata percentage on or 6 before September 30. 7 (3) On or before July 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the 8 assessor shall report to the county auditor that portion of the 9 total actual value of all commercial property and industrial 10 property in the county that is subject to the assessment 11 limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), 12 subparagraph division (a), and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), 13 subparagraph division (a), for the assessment year used to 14 calculate the taxes due and payable in that fiscal year. 15 Sec. 11. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph e, 16 subparagraph (4), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 On or before September 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the 19 county auditor shall prepare a statement, based on the report 20 received in subparagraph (3) and information transmitted to 21 the county auditor under chapter 434 , listing for each taxing 22 district in the county: 23 Sec. 12. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following apply 24 retroactively to assessment years beginning on or after January 25 1, 2026: 26 1. The section of this division of this Act amending 27 section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph âbâ, subparagraph (2), 28 subparagraph divisions (a) and (b). 29 2. The section of this division of this Act amending 30 section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (2), 31 subparagraph divisions (a) and (b). 32 DIVISION III 33 PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTIONS AND CREDITS 34 Sec. 13. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph f, 35 -8- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 8/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2026, are amended to read as 1 follows: 2 (1) The homestead property tax exemption and credit under 3 chapter 425 , subchapter I . 4 (2) The elderly and disabled property tax growth credit 5 under chapter 425 , subchapter II . 6 Sec. 14. Section 10A.518, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 b. The rules shall require the installation of smoke 9 detectors in existing single-family rental units and 10 multiple-unit residential buildings. Existing single-family 11 dwelling units shall be equipped with approved smoke detectors. 12 A person who files for a homestead credit exemption pursuant to 13 chapter 425 , subchapter I, shall certify that the single-family 14 dwelling unit for which the credit exemption is filed has a 15 smoke detector installed in compliance with this section , or 16 that one will be installed within thirty days of the date the 17 filing for the credit exemption is made. The director shall 18 adopt rules and establish appropriate procedures to administer 19 this subsection . 20 Sec. 15. Section 10A.518, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 21 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 b. The rules shall require the installation of carbon 23 monoxide alarms in existing single-family rental units and 24 multiple-unit residential buildings that have a fuel-fired 25 heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage. 26 Existing single-family dwellings that have a fuel-fired heater 27 or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage shall be 28 equipped with approved carbon monoxide alarms. For purposes 29 of this paragraph, âapproved carbon monoxide alarmâ means a 30 carbon monoxide alarm that meets the standards established by 31 the underwritersâ laboratories or is approved by the director 32 as established by rule under subsection 5 . A person who files 33 for a homestead credit exemption pursuant to chapter 425 , 34 subchapter I, shall certify that the single-family dwelling for 35 -9- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 9/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ which the credit exemption is filed and that has a fuel-fired 1 heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage, has 2 carbon monoxide alarms installed in compliance with this 3 section , or that such alarms will be installed within thirty 4 days of the date the filing for the credit exemption is made. 5 The director shall adopt rules and establish appropriate 6 procedures to administer this subsection . 7 Sec. 16. Section 25B.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 8 by striking the subsection. 9 Sec. 17. Section 103.22, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 7. Prohibit an owner of property from performing work on the 12 ownerâs principal residence, if such residence is an existing 13 dwelling rather than new construction and is not an apartment 14 that is attached to any other apartment or building, as those 15 terms are defined in section 499B.2 , and is not larger than a 16 single-family dwelling, or require such owner to be licensed 17 under this chapter . In order to qualify for inapplicability 18 pursuant to this subsection , a residence shall qualify for the 19 homestead tax credit exemption . 20 Sec. 18. Section 105.11, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 3. Prohibit an owner of property from performing work on the 23 ownerâs principal residence, if such residence is an existing 24 dwelling rather than new construction and is not larger than a 25 single-family dwelling, or farm property, excluding commercial 26 or industrial installations or installations in public use 27 buildings or facilities, or require such owner to be licensed 28 under this chapter . In order to qualify for inapplicability 29 pursuant to this subsection , a residence shall qualify for the 30 homestead tax credit exemption . 31 Sec. 19. Section 216.12, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 e. The rental or leasing of a housing accommodation in a 34 building which contains housing accommodations for not more 35 -10- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 10/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ than four families living independently of each other, if the 1 owner resides in one of the housing accommodations for which 2 the owner qualifies for the homestead tax credit exemption 3 under section 425.1 chapter 425, subchapter I . 4 Sec. 20. Section 321.1, subsection 6C, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 6C. âBona fide residenceâ or âbona fide addressâ means 7 the current street or highway address of an individualâs 8 residence. The bona fide residence of a person with more than 9 one dwelling is the dwelling for which the person claims a 10 homestead tax credit exemption under chapter 425 , subchapter I , 11 if applicable. The bona fide residence of a homeless person 12 is a primary nighttime residence meeting one of the criteria 13 listed in section 48A.2, subsection 3 . 14 Sec. 21. Section 331.401, subsection 1, paragraphs e and f, 15 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 16 e. Adopt resolutions authorizing the county assessor 17 to provide forms for homestead tax exemption and credit 18 claimants as provided in section 425.2 and military service tax 19 exemptions as provided in section 426A.14 . 20 f. Examine and allow or disallow claims for homestead 21 tax exemption and credit in accordance with section 425.3 22 chapter 425, subchapter I, and claims for military service 23 tax exemption in accordance with chapter 426A . The board, 24 by a single resolution, may allow or disallow the exemptions 25 recommended by the assessor. 26 Sec. 22. Section 331.512, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 3. Carry out duties relating to the homestead tax exemption 29 and credit and agricultural land tax credit as provided in 30 chapters 425 and 426 . 31 Sec. 23. Section 331.559, subsection 11, Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 11. Carry out duties relating to the administration of 34 the homestead tax exemption and credit and other credits as 35 -11- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 11/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ provided in sections 425.4 , 425.5 , 425.7 , 425.9 , 425.10 , and 1 425.25 chapter 425 . 2 Sec. 24. Section 404.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 1. All qualified real estate assessed as residential 5 property is eligible to receive an exemption from taxation 6 based on the actual value added by the improvements. The 7 exemption is for a period of ten years. The amount of the 8 exemption is equal to a percent of the actual value added by 9 the improvements, determined as follows: One hundred fifteen 10 percent of the value added by the improvements. However, the 11 amount of the actual value added by the improvements which 12 shall be used to compute the exemption shall not exceed twenty 13 thousand dollars and the granting of the exemption shall not 14 result in the actual value of the qualified real estate being 15 reduced below the actual value on which the homestead credit 16 exemption is computed under section 425.1 . 17 Sec. 25. Section 425.1, Code 2026, is amended by striking 18 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 19 425.1 Property tax exemption. 20 1. For each assessment year beginning on or after January 21 1, 2026, an exemption from taxation shall be allowed on each 22 eligible homestead as follows: 23 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the eligible 24 homestead, not to exceed four thousand eight hundred fifty 25 dollars in taxable value. 26 b. (1) If the owner of the homestead is any of the 27 following, the exemption allowed on the homestead shall be the 28 entire taxable value of the homestead: 29 (a) A veteran of any of the military forces of the United 30 States who acquired the homestead under 38 U.S.C. Â§21.801, 31 21.802, prior to August 6, 1991, or under 38 U.S.C. Â§2101, 32 2102. 33 (b) A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 34 service-connected disability rating of one hundred percent, as 35 -12- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 12/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ certified by the United States department of veterans affairs, 1 or a permanent and total disability rating based on individual 2 unemployability that is compensated at the one hundred percent 3 disability rate, as certified by the United States department 4 of veterans affairs. 5 (c) A former member of the national guard of any state 6 who otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 7 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 8 permanent service-connected disability rating of one hundred 9 percent, as certified by the United States department of 10 veterans affairs, or a permanent and total disability rating 11 based on individual unemployability that is compensated at the 12 one hundred percent disability rate, as certified by the United 13 States department of veterans affairs. 14 (d) An individual who is a surviving spouse or a child and 15 who is receiving dependency and indemnity compensation pursuant 16 to 38 U.S.C. Â§1301 et seq., as certified by the United States 17 department of veterans affairs. 18 (2) (a) For an owner described in subparagraph (1), 19 subparagraph division (a), (b), or (c), the exemption allowed 20 shall be continued to the estate of an owner who is deceased 21 or the surviving spouse and any child, as defined in section 22 234.1, who are the beneficiaries of a deceased owner, so long 23 as the surviving spouse remains unmarried. 24 (b) An individual described in subparagraph (1), 25 subparagraph division (d), is no longer eligible for the 26 exemption upon termination of dependency and indemnity 27 compensation under 38 U.S.C. Â§1301 et seq. 28 (3) An owner or a beneficiary of an owner who elects to 29 secure the exemption provided in this paragraph is not eligible 30 for the exemption provided in paragraph âaâ or any other real 31 property tax credit or exemption provided by law for veterans 32 of military service. 33 (4) If an owner acquires a different homestead, the 34 exemption allowed under this paragraph may be claimed on 35 -13- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 13/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the new homestead unless the owner fails to meet the other 1 requirements of this paragraph. 2 (5) (a) Except as provided in subparagraph division (b), 3 the list of the names and addresses of individuals allowed an 4 exemption under this paragraph and maintained by the county 5 recorder, county treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, 6 or other governmental body is confidential information and 7 shall not be disseminated to any person unless otherwise 8 ordered by a court or released by the lawful custodian of 9 the records pursuant to state or federal law. The county 10 recorder, county treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, 11 or other governmental body responsible for maintaining the 12 names and addresses of individuals allowed an exemption under 13 this paragraph may display such exemption on individual paper 14 records and individual electronic records, including display on 15 an internet site. 16 (b) Upon request, a county recorder, county assessor, city 17 assessor, or other entity may share information as described in 18 subparagraph division (a) to a county veterans service officer 19 for purposes of providing information on benefits and services 20 available to veterans and their families. 21 (6) For purposes of this paragraph, âpermanent and total 22 disability rating based on individual unemployabilityâ means 23 a condition under which a person has either a permanent 24 service-connected disability rating of sixty percent or two or 25 more permanent service-connected disability conditions in which 26 one of the conditions has at least a forty percent rating and 27 the combined rating for all the conditions is at least seventy 28 percent, and the person has an administrative adjustment added 29 to the service-connected disability rating, due to individual 30 unemployability, such that the United States department of 31 veterans affairs rates the veteran permanently and totally 32 disabled for purposes of disability compensation. 33 2. Section 25B.7 shall not apply to the property tax 34 exemption provided in this subchapter. 35 -14- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 14/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 3. Homestead credit claims approved under chapter 425, 1 subchapter I, Code 2026, prior to and valid on the effective 2 date of this division of this Act shall result in a homestead 3 exemption under this subchapter I without further filing by the 4 claimant if the claimant meets the criteria for the exemption 5 and the assessor has appropriate information to verify such 6 eligibility. 7 Sec. 26. Section 425.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 425.2 Qualifying for credit exemption . 10 1. A person who wishes to qualify for the homestead credit 11 exemption allowed under this subchapter shall obtain the 12 appropriate forms for filing for the credit exemption from the 13 assessor. The person claiming the credit exemption shall file 14 a verified statement and designation of homestead with the 15 assessor for the year for which the person is first claiming 16 the credit exemption . The claim shall be filed not later than 17 July 1 of the year for which the person is claiming the credit 18 exemption . A claim filed after July 1 of the year for which the 19 person is claiming the credit exemption shall be considered as 20 a claim filed for the following year. 21 2. Upon the filing and allowance of the claim, the claim 22 shall be allowed on that homestead for successive years without 23 further filing as long as the property is legally or equitably 24 owned and used as a homestead by that person or that personâs 25 spouse on July 1 of each of those successive years, and the 26 owner of the property being claimed as a homestead declares 27 residency in Iowa for purposes of income taxation, and the 28 property is occupied by that person or that personâs spouse 29 for at least six months in each of those calendar years in 30 which the fiscal year begins. When the property is sold or 31 transferred, the buyer or transferee who wishes to qualify 32 shall refile for the credit exemption . However, when the 33 property is transferred as part of a distribution made pursuant 34 to chapter 598 , the transferee who is the spouse retaining 35 -15- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 15/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ ownership of the property is not required to refile for the 1 credit exemption . Property divided pursuant to chapter 598 2 shall not be modified following the division of the property. 3 An owner who ceases to use a property for a homestead or 4 intends not to use it as a homestead for at least six months in 5 a calendar year shall provide written notice to the assessor 6 by July 1 following the date on which the use is changed. A 7 person who sells or transfers a homestead or the personal 8 representative of a deceased person who had a homestead at the 9 time of death, shall provide written notice to the assessor 10 that the property is no longer the homestead of the former 11 claimant. 12 3. In case the owner of the homestead is in active service 13 in the armed forces of this state or of the United States, 14 or is sixty-five years of age or older, or is disabled, the 15 statement and designation may be signed and delivered by any 16 member of the ownerâs family, by the ownerâs guardian or 17 conservator, or by any other person who may represent the owner 18 under power of attorney. If the owner of the homestead is 19 married, the spouse may sign and deliver the statement and 20 designation. The director of health and human services or 21 the directorâs designee may make application for the benefits 22 of this subchapter as the agent for and on behalf of persons 23 receiving assistance under chapter 249 . 24 4. The form for claiming the credit shall also include 25 the ability to claim the exemption under section 425.1A for 26 qualified owners. If the claim for the homestead credit is 27 allowed, such allowance shall also include allowance of the 28 homestead exemption if the owner meets the age criteria for 29 the exemption. The homestead exemption shall be allowed for 30 successive years without further filing in the same manner as 31 the homestead credit. 32 5. 4. Any person sixty-five years of age or older or 33 any person who is disabled may request, in writing, from the 34 appropriate assessor forms for filing for the homestead tax 35 -16- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 16/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ credit exemption . Any person sixty-five years of age or 1 older or who is disabled may complete the form, which shall 2 include a statement of homestead, and mail or return it to the 3 appropriate assessor. The signature of the claimant on the 4 statement shall be considered the claimantâs acknowledgment 5 that all statements and facts entered on the form are correct 6 to the best of the claimantâs knowledge. 7 6. 5. Upon adoption of a resolution by the county board 8 of supervisors, any person may request, in writing, from the 9 appropriate assessor forms for the filing for homestead tax 10 credit exemption . The person may complete the form, which 11 shall include a statement of homestead, and mail or return it 12 to the appropriate assessor. The signature of the claimant on 13 the statement of homestead shall be considered the claimantâs 14 acknowledgment that all statements and facts entered on the 15 form are correct to the best of the claimantâs knowledge. 16 Sec. 27. Section 425.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 425.3 Verification of claims for homestead credit exemption . 19 1. The assessor shall retain a permanent file of current 20 homestead exemption claims filed in the assessorâs office. The 21 assessor shall file a notice of transfer of property for which 22 a claim is filed when notice is received from the office of the 23 county recorder. 24 2. The county recorder shall give notice to the assessor 25 of each transfer of title filed in the recorderâs office. The 26 notice shall describe the property transferred, the name of the 27 person transferring the title to the property, and the name of 28 the person to whom title to the property has been transferred. 29 3. Not later than July 6 of each year, the assessor shall 30 remit the statements and designation of homesteads to the 31 county auditor with the assessorâs recommendation for allowance 32 or disallowance. If the assessor recommends disallowance 33 of a claim, the assessor shall submit the reasons for the 34 recommendation, in writing, to the county auditor. 35 -17- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 17/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 4. The county auditor shall forward the claims to the board 1 of supervisors. The board shall allow or disallow the claims. 2 If the board disallows a claim, it shall send written notice, 3 by mail, to the claimant at the claimantâs last known address. 4 The notice shall state the reasons for disallowing the claim. 5 The board is not required to send notice that a claim is 6 disallowed if the claimant voluntarily withdraws the claim. 7 Sec. 28. Section 425.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 425.4 Certification to treasurer . 10 All claims which have been allowed by the board of 11 supervisors shall be certified on or before August 1, in each 12 year, by the county auditor to the county treasurer, which 13 certificates shall list the total amount of dollars, listed by 14 taxing district in the county, due for homestead tax exemptions 15 and credits claimed and allowed assessor . The county treasurer 16 shall then certify to the department of revenue the total 17 amount of dollars, listed by taxing district in the county, due 18 for homestead tax credits claimed and allowed. 19 Sec. 29. Section 425.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 425.6 Waiver by neglect. 22 If a person fails to file a claim or to have a claim on file 23 with the assessor for the credits exemption provided in this 24 subchapter , the person is deemed to have waived the homestead 25 exemption and credit for the year in which the person failed to 26 file the claim or to have a claim on file with the assessor. 27 Sec. 30. Section 425.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 3. a. If the department of revenue determines that a claim 30 for homestead exemption and credit has been allowed by the 31 board of supervisors which is not justifiable under the law 32 and not substantiated by proper facts, the department may, at 33 any time within thirty-six months from July 1 of the year in 34 which the claim is allowed, set aside the allowance. Notice 35 -18- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 18/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ of the disallowance shall be given to the county auditor of 1 the county in which the claim has been improperly granted and 2 a written notice of the disallowance shall also be addressed 3 to the claimant at the claimantâs last known address. The 4 claimant or board of supervisors may appeal to the director 5 of revenue within thirty days from the date of the notice of 6 disallowance. The director shall grant a hearing and if, upon 7 the hearing, the director determines that the disallowance was 8 incorrect, the director shall set aside the disallowance. The 9 director shall notify the claimant and the board of supervisors 10 of the result of the hearing. The claimant or the board of 11 supervisors may seek judicial review of the action of the 12 director of revenue in accordance with chapter 17A . 13 b. If a claim is disallowed by the department of revenue 14 and not appealed to the director of revenue or appealed to 15 the director of revenue and thereafter upheld upon final 16 resolution, including any judicial review, any amounts of 17 exemptions allowed and credits allowed and paid from the 18 homestead credit fund including the penalty, if any, become a 19 lien upon the property on which the exemption or credit was 20 originally granted, if still in the hands of the claimant, 21 and not in the hands of a bona fide purchaser, and any amount 22 so erroneously paid including the penalty, if any, shall be 23 collected by the county treasurer in the same manner as other 24 taxes and the collections shall be returned to the department 25 of revenue and credited to the homestead credit fund . The 26 director of revenue may institute legal proceedings against a 27 homestead credit claimant for the collection of payments made 28 on disallowed credits and the penalty, if any. If a person 29 makes a false claim or affidavit with fraudulent intent to 30 obtain the homestead exemption or credit , the person is guilty 31 of a fraudulent practice and the claim shall be disallowed 32 in full. If the credit has been paid, the amount of the 33 credit plus a penalty equal to twenty-five percent of the 34 amount of credit plus interest, at the rate in effect under 35 -19- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 19/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ section 421.7 , from the time of payment shall be collected 1 by the county treasurer in the same manner as other property 2 taxes, penalty, and interest are collected and when collected 3 shall be paid to the director of revenue. If a homestead 4 exemption or credit is disallowed and the claimant failed to 5 give written notice to the assessor as required by section 6 425.2 when the property ceased to be used as a homestead by the 7 claimant, a civil penalty equal to five percent of the amount 8 of the disallowed exemption or credit is assessed against the 9 claimant. 10 Sec. 31. Section 425.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. The director of revenue shall prescribe the form 13 for the making of a verified statement and designation of 14 homestead, the form for the supporting affidavits required 15 herein, and such other forms as may be necessary for the proper 16 administration of this subchapter . Whenever necessary, the 17 department of revenue shall forward to the county auditors of 18 the several counties in the state the prescribed sample forms, 19 and the county auditors shall furnish blank forms prepared in 20 accordance therewith with the assessment rolls, books, and 21 supplies delivered to the assessors. The department of revenue 22 shall prescribe and the county auditors shall provide on the 23 forms for claiming the homestead credit exemption a statement 24 to the effect that the owner realizes that the owner must give 25 written notice to the assessor when the owner changes the use 26 of the property. 27 Sec. 32. Section 425.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 425.10 Reversal of allowed claim. 30 In the event any claim is allowed, and subsequently reversed 31 on appeal, any exemption and credit made under the claim shall 32 be void. The amount of tax resulting from the erroneous credit 33 exemption shall be charged against the property in question, 34 and the director of revenue, the county auditor, and the county 35 -20- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 20/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ treasurer are authorized and directed to correct their books 1 and records accordingly. The amount of the erroneous credit, 2 when collected, shall be returned by the county treasurer to 3 the homestead credit fund to be reallocated the following year 4 as provided in this subchapter . Taxes due following reversal 5 of a claim for an exemption shall be collected by the county 6 treasurer and allocated to the appropriate taxing entities. 7 Sec. 33. Section 425.11, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 8 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 For the purpose of this subchapter and wherever used in this 10 subchapter : 11 Sec. 34. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph d, 12 subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 The homestead includes the dwelling house which the owner, 15 in good faith, is occupying as a home on July 1 of the year for 16 which the credit exemption is claimed and occupies as a home 17 for at least six months during the calendar year in which the 18 fiscal year begins, except as otherwise provided. 19 Sec. 35. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph d, 20 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 (3) It must not embrace more than one dwelling house, but 22 where a homestead has more than one dwelling house situated 23 thereon, the exemption and credit provided for in this 24 subchapter shall apply to the home and buildings used by the 25 owner, but shall not apply to any other dwelling house and 26 buildings appurtenant. 27 Sec. 36. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph e, 28 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 (2) For the purpose of this subchapter , the word âownerâ 30 shall be construed to mean a bona fide owner and not one for 31 the purpose only of availing the person of the benefits of this 32 subchapter . In order to qualify for the homestead tax credit 33 and exemption, evidence of ownership shall be on file in the 34 office of the clerk of the district court or recorded in the 35 -21- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 21/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ office of the county recorder at the time the owner files with 1 the assessor a verified statement of the homestead claimed by 2 the owner as provided in section 425.2 . 3 Sec. 37. Section 425.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 425.12 Indian land. 6 Each forty acres of land, or fraction thereof, occupied by 7 a member or members of the Sac and Fox Indians in Tama county, 8 which land is held in trust by the secretary of the interior of 9 the United States for said Indians, shall be given a homestead 10 tax exemption and credit within the meaning and under the 11 provisions of this subchapter . Application for such homestead 12 tax exemption and credit shall be made to the county auditor of 13 Tama county and may be made by a representative of the tribal 14 council. 15 Sec. 38. Section 425.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 425.13 Conspiracy to defraud. 18 If any two or more persons conspire and confederate together 19 with fraudulent intent to obtain the exemption or credit 20 provided for under the terms of this subchapter by making a 21 false deed, or a false contract of purchase, they are guilty of 22 a fraudulent practice. 23 Sec. 39. Section 425.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 425.16 Additional Property tax growth credit. 26 1. a. In addition to the homestead tax credit exemption 27 allowed under section 425.1, subsections 1 through 4, and 28 the homestead exemption under section 425.1A , if applicable, 29 persons claimants who own or rent their homesteads homestead 30 that has a qualifying actual value and who meet the 31 qualifications provided in this subchapter are eligible 32 for a property tax growth credit for property taxes due or 33 reimbursement of rent constituting property taxes paid . 34 b. For purposes of this section, âqualifying actual valueâ 35 -22- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 22/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ means one of the following: 1 (1) An actual value of three hundred fifty thousand dollars 2 or less for the applicable assessment year. 3 (2) An actual value that exceeds three hundred fifty 4 thousand dollars for the applicable assessment year and all of 5 the following apply: 6 (a) The actual value of the homestead was equal to or less 7 than three hundred fifty thousand dollars for the first year 8 for which the owner claimed the credit. 9 (b) The increase in the homesteadâs actual value since 10 the first-year claim was not the result of improvements, 11 structural replacements, or modifications to the homestead 12 beyond necessary repairs. 13 (c) The owner has claimed the credit for each subsequent 14 year since the first-year claim. 15 2. a. The property tax growth credit for property taxes due 16 under this subchapter shall be administered by the department 17 of revenue, the assessor, and other county officials as 18 provided in this subchapter . 19 b. The reimbursement of rent constituting property taxes 20 paid under this subchapter shall be administered by the 21 department of health and human services as provided in this 22 subchapter . 23 3. Section 25B.7 shall not apply to the credit under this 24 subchapter. 25 Sec. 40. Section 425.17, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 425.17 Definitions. 28 As used in this subchapter , unless the context otherwise 29 requires: 30 1. âBase yearâ means the calendar year last ending before 31 the claim is filed. 32 2. a. âClaimantâ means any of the following: 33 (1) A person filing a claim for credit under this subchapter 34 who has attained the age of sixty-five years but who has 35 -23- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 23/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ not attained the age of seventy years on or before December 1 31 of the base year, a person filing a claim for credit or 2 reimbursement under this subchapter who is totally disabled 3 and was totally disabled on or before December 31 of the base 4 year , or a person filing a claim for reimbursement under this 5 subchapter who has attained the age of sixty-five years on or 6 before December 31 of the base year and who is domiciled in 7 this state at the time the claim is filed or at the time of the 8 personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the executor or 9 administrator of the claimantâs estate , if the person received 10 a credit for property taxes due for the homestead under the 11 schedule specified in section 425.23, subsection 1, paragraph 12 âaâ , Code 2026, for property taxes due and payable in the fiscal 13 year beginning July 1, 2026, and if the person has filed for 14 the credit under this subchapter for each of the subsequent 15 years, if any . 16 (2) A person filing a claim for credit or reimbursement 17 under this subchapter who has attained the age of twenty-three 18 years on or before December 31 of the base year or was a head 19 of household on December 31 of the base year, as defined in 20 the Internal Revenue Code , but has not attained the age or 21 disability status described in subparagraph (1) or the age 22 status and eligibility criteria of subparagraph (3), and is 23 domiciled in this state at the time the claim is filed or at the 24 time of the personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the 25 executor or administrator of the claimantâs estate, and was not 26 claimed as a dependent on any other personâs tax return for the 27 base year. 28 (3) (2) A person filing a claim for credit under this 29 subchapter who has attained the age of seventy sixty-five years 30 on or before December 31 of the base year , who has a household 31 income of less than two hundred fifty percent of the federal 32 poverty level, as defined by the most recently revised poverty 33 income guidelines published by the United States department of 34 health and human services, and is domiciled in this state at 35 -24- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 24/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the time the claim is filed or at the time of the personâs death 1 in the case of a claim filed by the executor or administrator 2 of the claimantâs estate . 3 b. âClaimantâ under paragraph âaâ includes a vendee in 4 possession under a contract for deed and may include one or 5 more joint tenants or tenants in common. In the case of a claim 6 for rent constituting property taxes paid, the claimant shall 7 have rented the property during any part of the base year. In 8 the case of a claim for property taxes due, the claimant shall 9 have occupied the property during any part of the fiscal year 10 beginning July 1 of the base year. If a homestead is occupied 11 by two or more persons, and more than one person is able to 12 qualify as a claimant, the persons may each file a claim based 13 upon each personâs income and rent constituting property taxes 14 paid or property taxes due. 15 3. âGross rentâ means rental paid at armâs length for the 16 right of occupancy of a homestead or manufactured or mobile 17 home, including rent for space occupied by a manufactured or 18 mobile home not to exceed one acre. If the department of 19 health and human services determines that the landlord and 20 tenant have not dealt with each other at armâs length, and the 21 department of health and human services is satisfied that the 22 gross rent charged was excessive, the department of health and 23 human services shall adjust the gross rent to a reasonable 24 amount as determined by the department of health and human 25 services. 26 4. 3. âHomesteadâ means the dwelling owned or rented and 27 actually used as a home by the claimant during the period 28 specified in subsection 2 , and so much of the land surrounding 29 it including one or more contiguous lots or tracts of land, as 30 is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, but 31 not exceeding one-half acre, and may consist of a part of a 32 multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land 33 upon which it is built. It does not include personal property 34 except that a manufactured or mobile home may be a homestead. 35 -25- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 25/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Any dwelling or a part of a multidwelling or multipurpose 1 building which is exempt from taxation, except for an exemption 2 under section 425.1A subchapter I , does not qualify as a 3 homestead under this subchapter . However, solely for purposes 4 of claimants living in a property and receiving reimbursement 5 for rent constituting property taxes paid immediately before 6 the property becomes tax exempt, and continuing to live in it 7 after it becomes tax exempt, the property shall continue to 8 be classified as a homestead. A homestead must be located 9 in this state. When a person is confined in a nursing home, 10 extended-care facility, or hospital, the person shall be 11 considered as occupying or living in the personâs homestead 12 if the person is the owner of the homestead and the person 13 maintains the homestead and does not lease, rent, or otherwise 14 receive profits from other persons for the use of the 15 homestead. 16 5. 4. âHouseholdâ means a claimant and the claimantâs 17 spouse if living with the claimant at any time during the base 18 year. âLiving withâ refers to domicile and does not include a 19 temporary visit. 20 6. âHousehold incomeâ means all income of the claimant 21 and the claimantâs spouse in a household and actual monetary 22 contributions received from any other person living with the 23 claimant during their respective twelve-month income tax 24 accounting periods ending with or during the base year. 25 7. âIncomeâ means the sum of Iowa net income as defined 26 in section 422.7 , plus all of the following to the extent not 27 already included in Iowa net income: capital gains; alimony; 28 child support money; cash public assistance and relief, except 29 property tax relief granted under this subchapter ; amount 30 of in-kind assistance for housing expenses; total amounts 31 received from a governmental or other pension or retirement 32 plan, including defined benefit or defined contribution plans; 33 annuities; individual retirement accounts; plans maintained or 34 contributed to by an employer, or maintained or contributed to 35 -26- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 26/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ by a self-employed person as an employer; deferred compensation 1 plans or any earnings attributable to the deferred compensation 2 plans; income received pursuant to a farm tenancy agreement 3 covering real property; railroad retirement benefits; payments 4 received under the federal Social Security Act , except child 5 insurance benefits received by a member of the claimantâs 6 household; military retirement and veteransâ disability 7 pensions; interest received from a state or federal government 8 or any of its instrumentalities; workersâ compensation; 9 and the gross amount of disability income or âloss of timeâ 10 insurance. âIncomeâ does not include gifts from nongovernmental 11 sources, or surplus foods or other relief in kind supplied by 12 a governmental agency. In determining income, net operating 13 losses and net capital losses shall not be considered. 14 8. 5. âProperty taxes dueâ means property taxes including 15 any special assessments, but exclusive of delinquent interest 16 and charges for services, due on a claimantâs homestead in this 17 state, but includes only property taxes for which the claimant 18 is liable and which will actually be paid by the claimant. 19 However, if the claimant is a person whose property taxes have 20 been suspended under sections 427.8 and 427.9 , âproperty taxes 21 dueâ means property taxes including any special assessments, 22 but exclusive of delinquent interest and charges for services, 23 due on a claimantâs homestead in this state, but includes only 24 property taxes for which the claimant is liable and which would 25 have to be paid by the claimant if the payment of the taxes 26 has not been suspended pursuant to sections 427.8 and 427.9 . 27 âProperty taxes dueâ shall be computed with no deduction for 28 any credit under this subchapter or for any homestead credit 29 allowed under subchapter I . Each claim shall be based upon the 30 taxes due during the fiscal year next following the base year. 31 If a homestead is owned by two or more persons as joint tenants 32 or tenants in common, and one or more persons are not members 33 of claimantâs household, âproperty taxes dueâ is that part of 34 property taxes due on the homestead which equals the ownership 35 -27- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 27/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ percentage of the claimant and the claimantâs household. The 1 county treasurer shall include with the tax receipt a statement 2 that if the owner of the property is eighteen years of age 3 or over, the person may be eligible for the credit allowed 4 under this subchapter . If a homestead is an integral part 5 of a farm, the claimant may use the total property taxes due 6 for the larger unit. If a homestead is an integral part of a 7 multidwelling or multipurpose building the property taxes due 8 for the purpose of this subsection shall be prorated to reflect 9 the portion which the value of the property that the household 10 occupies as its homestead is to the value of the entire 11 structure. For purposes of this subsection , âunitâ refers to 12 that parcel of property covered by a single tax statement of 13 which the homestead is a part. 14 9. âRent constituting property taxes paidâ means twenty-three 15 percent of the gross rent actually paid in cash or its 16 equivalent during the base year by the claimant or the 17 claimantâs household solely for the right of occupancy of their 18 homestead in the base year, and which rent constitutes the 19 basis, in the succeeding year, of a claim for reimbursement 20 under this subchapter by the claimant. 21 10. 6. âSpecial assessmentâ means an unpaid special 22 assessment certified pursuant to chapter 384, subchapter IV . 23 The claimant may include as a portion of the taxes due during 24 the fiscal year next following the base year an amount equal to 25 the unpaid special assessment installment due, plus interest, 26 during the fiscal year next following the base year. 27 11. 7. âTotally disabledâ means the inability to engage 28 in any substantial gainful employment by reason of any 29 medically determinable physical or mental impairment which 30 can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or is 31 reasonably expected to last for a continuous period of not less 32 than twelve months. 33 Sec. 41. Section 425.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -28- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 28/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 425.18 Right to file a claim Claim . 1 1. Subject to the limitations provided in this subchapter, 2 a claimant may annually claim a credit for property taxes due 3 during the fiscal year next following the base year. 4 2. The right to file a claim for reimbursement or a credit 5 under this subchapter may be exercised by the claimant or 6 on behalf of a claimant by the claimantâs legal guardian, 7 spouse, or attorney, or by the executor or administrator of the 8 claimantâs estate. If a claimant dies after having filed a 9 claim for reimbursement for rent constituting property taxes 10 paid, the amount of the reimbursement may be paid to another 11 member of the household as determined by the department of 12 health and human services. If the claimant was the only 13 member of the household, the reimbursement may be paid to 14 the claimantâs executor or administrator, but if neither is 15 appointed and qualified within one year from the date of the 16 filing of the claim, the reimbursement shall escheat to the 17 state. If a claimant dies after having filed a claim for 18 credit for property taxes due, the amount of credit for the 19 applicable year of the filed claim shall be paid as if the 20 claimant had not died. 21 3. A claim for credit for property taxes due shall not be 22 allowed unless the claim is filed with the county treasurer 23 between January 1 and June 1, both dates inclusive, immediately 24 preceding the fiscal year during which the property taxes 25 are due. However, in case of sickness, absence, or other 26 disability of the claimant, or if in the judgment of the county 27 treasurer good cause exists, the county treasurer may extend 28 the time for filing a claim for credit through March 31 of the 29 fiscal year during which the property taxes are due. 30 Sec. 42. Section 425.22, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 425.22 One claimant per household. 33 Only one claimant per household per year shall be entitled to 34 reimbursement under this subchapter and only one claimant per 35 -29- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 29/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ household per fiscal year shall be entitled to a credit under 1 this subchapter . 2 Sec. 43. Section 425.23, Code 2026, is amended by striking 3 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 4 425.23 Amount of credit. 5 The amount of the credit under this subchapter shall be the 6 difference between the actual amount of property taxes due on 7 the homestead during the fiscal year next following the base 8 year minus the lesser of the following: 9 1. The actual amount of property taxes due on the homestead 10 during the first fiscal year for which the claimant filed a 11 claim for a credit calculated under this section and for which 12 the property taxes due on the homestead were calculated on an 13 assessed valuation that was not a partial assessment and if the 14 claimant has filed for the credit calculated under this section 15 for each of the subsequent fiscal years after the first credit 16 claimed. 17 2. The actual amount of property taxes due on the homestead 18 during a fiscal year following the first fiscal year for which 19 the claimant filed a claim for a credit calculated under this 20 section and for which the property taxes due on the homestead 21 were calculated on an assessed valuation that was not a 22 partial assessment and if the claimant has filed for the credit 23 calculated under this section for each of the subsequent fiscal 24 years after the first credit claimed. 25 3. The actual amount of property taxes due on the homestead 26 during the first fiscal year for which the claimant filed a 27 claim for a credit calculated under section 425.23, subsection 28 1, paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), Code 2026, or prior 29 applicable Code, and for which the property taxes due on the 30 homestead were calculated on an assessed valuation that was 31 not a partial assessment and if the claimant has filed for the 32 credit calculated under section 425.23, subsection 1, paragraph 33 âcâ , subparagraph (2), Code 2026, or this section for each of 34 the subsequent fiscal years after the first credit claimed. 35 -30- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 30/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 44. Section 425.25, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 425.25 Administration ââ claim forms. 3 1. The director of revenue shall make available suitable 4 forms with instructions for claimants of the credit for 5 property taxes due. Each assessor and county treasurer shall 6 make available the forms and instructions. The claim shall 7 be in a form as the director of revenue may prescribe. The 8 director shall also devise a tax credit table, with amounts 9 rounded to the nearest even whole dollar. Credits in the 10 amount of less than one dollar shall not be paid. 11 2. The director of health and human services shall make 12 available suitable forms with instructions for claimants of the 13 reimbursement for rent constituting property taxes paid. The 14 claim shall be in a form as the director of health and human 15 services may prescribe. The director of revenue shall devise a 16 reimbursement table with amounts rounded to the nearest even 17 whole dollar and provide such table to the director of health 18 and human services. Reimbursements in the amount of less than 19 one dollar shall not be paid. 20 Sec. 45. Section 425.26, Code 2026, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 425.26 Proof of claim. 23 1. Every claimant for the credit for property taxes due 24 shall give the department of revenue, in support of the claim, 25 reasonable proof of: 26 a. Age and total disability, if any. 27 b. Property taxes due. 28 c. Homestead credit allowed against property taxes due. 29 d. c. Changes of homestead. 30 e. d. Household membership. 31 f. Household income. 32 g. e. Size and nature of property claimed as the homestead. 33 2. Every claimant for reimbursement of rent constituting 34 property taxes paid shall give the department of health and 35 -31- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 31/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ human services, in support of the claim, reasonable proof of: 1 a. Age and total disability, if any. 2 b. Rent constituting property taxes paid, including the name 3 and address of the owner or manager of the property rented and 4 a statement whether the claimant is related by blood, marriage, 5 or adoption to the owner or manager of the property rented. 6 c. Changes of homestead. 7 d. Household membership. 8 e. Household income. 9 f. Size and nature of property claimed as the homestead. 10 3. 2. The department of revenue or the department of health 11 and human services may require any additional proof necessary 12 to support a claim. 13 Sec. 46. Section 425.27, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 425.27 Audit ââ recalculation or denial ââ appeals. 16 1. a. The department of revenue is responsible for the 17 audit of claims for credit of property taxes due under this 18 subchapter . 19 b. The department of health and human services is 20 responsible for the audit of claims for reimbursement for rent 21 constituting property taxes paid under this subchapter . 22 2. If on the audit of a claim for credit under this 23 subchapter , the department of revenue determines the amount of 24 the claim to have been incorrectly calculated or that the claim 25 is not allowable, the department of revenue shall recalculate 26 the claim and notify the claimant of the recalculation or 27 denial and the reasons for it. The recalculation of the claim 28 shall be final unless appealed to the director of revenue 29 within thirty days from the date of notice of recalculation 30 or denial. The director of revenue shall grant a hearing, 31 and upon hearing determine the correct claim, if any, and 32 notify the claimant of the decision by mail. The department of 33 revenue shall not adjust a claim after three years from October 34 31 of the year in which the claim was filed. If the claim for 35 -32- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 32/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ credit has been paid allowed , the department of revenue shall 1 give notification to the claimant and the county treasurer 2 of the recalculation or denial of the claim and the county 3 treasurer shall proceed to collect the tax owed in the same 4 manner as other property taxes due and payable are collected, 5 if the property on which the credit was granted is still owned 6 by the claimant , and repay the amount to the director upon 7 collection . If the property on which the credit was granted is 8 not owned by the claimant, the amount may be recovered from the 9 claimant by assessment in the same manner that income taxes are 10 assessed under sections 422.26 and 422.30 . The decision of the 11 director of revenue shall be final unless appealed as provided 12 in section 425.31 . 13 3. If on the audit of a claim for reimbursement for rent 14 constituting property taxes paid under this subchapter , the 15 department of health and human services determines the amount 16 of the claim to have been incorrectly calculated or that the 17 claim is not allowable, the department of health and human 18 services shall recalculate the claim and notify the claimant 19 of the recalculation or denial and the reasons for it. The 20 recalculation of the claim shall be final unless appealed 21 to the director of health and human services within thirty 22 days from the date of notice of recalculation or denial. The 23 director of health and human services shall grant a hearing, 24 and upon hearing determine the correct claim, if any, and 25 notify the claimant of the decision by mail. The department of 26 health and human services shall not adjust a claim after three 27 years from October 31 of the year in which the claim was filed. 28 If the claim for reimbursement has been paid, the amount may be 29 recovered by the department of health and human services. The 30 decision of the director of health and human services shall be 31 final unless appealed as provided in section 425.31 . 32 4. a. 3. For the purpose of administering the credit 33 for property taxes due , including the duties of the director 34 of revenue and the department of revenue, section 422.70 is 35 -33- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 33/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ applicable with respect to this subchapter . 1 b. For the purpose of administering the reimbursement for 2 rent constituting property taxes paid, including the duties of 3 the director of health and human services and the department of 4 health and human services under this subchapter , the director 5 of health and human services shall have the same powers as 6 those described in section 422.70 . 7 Sec. 47. Section 425.29, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 425.29 False claim ââ penalty. 10 1. A person who makes a false affidavit for the purpose 11 of obtaining a credit or reimbursement provided for in under 12 this subchapter or who knowingly receives the credit or 13 reimbursement without being legally entitled to it or makes 14 claim for the credit or reimbursement in more than one county 15 in the state without being legally entitled to it is guilty of 16 a fraudulent practice. The claim for credit or reimbursement 17 shall be disallowed in full and if the claim has been paid the 18 amount shall be recovered in the manner provided in section 19 425.27 . 20 2. In the case of a claim for credit disallowed by the 21 department of revenue, the department of revenue may impose 22 penalties under section 421.27 . The department of revenue 23 shall send a notice of disallowance of the claim. 24 3. In the case of a claim for reimbursement disallowed by 25 the department of health and human services, the department of 26 health and human services may impose penalties described in 27 section 421.27 . The department of health and human services 28 shall send a notice of disallowance of the claim. 29 Sec. 48. Section 425.30, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 425.30 Notices. 32 1. A notice authorized or required under this subchapter 33 related to a credit for property taxes due may be given by 34 mailing the notice to the person for whom it is intended, 35 -34- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 34/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ addressed to that person at the address given in the last 1 credit claim form filed by the person pursuant to this 2 subchapter , or if no return has been filed, then to any address 3 obtainable. 4 2. A notice authorized or required under this subchapter 5 related to a reimbursement for rent constituting property taxes 6 paid may be given by mailing the notice to the person for whom 7 it is intended, addressed to that person at the address given 8 in the reimbursement claim form filed by the person pursuant 9 to this subchapter , or if no return has been filed, then to any 10 address obtainable. 11 3. 2. The mailing of the notice is presumptive evidence of 12 the receipt of the notice by the person to whom addressed. Any 13 period of time which is determined according to this subchapter 14 by the giving of notice commences to run from the date of 15 mailing of the notice. 16 Sec. 49. Section 425.31, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 425.31 Appeals. 19 1. Judicial review of the actions of the director of revenue 20 or the department of revenue under this subchapter may be 21 sought in accordance with the terms of chapter 17A and the 22 rules of the department of revenue. 23 2. Judicial review of the actions of the director of health 24 and human services or the department of health and human 25 services under this subchapter may be sought in accordance with 26 the terms of chapter 17A and the rules of the department of 27 health and human services. 28 3. 2. For cause and upon a showing by the director of 29 revenue or the director of health and human services, as 30 applicable, that collection of the amount in dispute is in 31 doubt, the court may order the petitioner to file with the 32 clerk a bond for the use of the respondent, with sureties 33 approved by the clerk, equal to the amount appealed from, 34 conditioned that the petitioner shall perform the orders of the 35 -35- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 35/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ court. 1 4. 3. An appeal may be taken by the claimant or the 2 director of revenue or the director of health and human 3 services, as applicable, to the supreme court of this state 4 irrespective of the amount involved. 5 Sec. 50. Section 425.32, Code 2026, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 425.32 Disallowance of certain claims for credit. 8 A claim for credit for property taxes due shall be disallowed 9 if the department of revenue finds that the claimant or a 10 person of the claimantâs household received title to the 11 homestead primarily for the purpose of receiving benefits under 12 this subchapter . 13 Sec. 51. Section 425.37, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 425.37 Rules. 16 The director of revenue and the director of health and human 17 services shall each adopt rules in accordance with chapter 18 17A for the interpretation and proper administration of this 19 subchapter and each departmentâs applicable powers and duties 20 under this subchapter , including rules to prevent and disallow 21 duplication of benefits and to prevent any unreasonable 22 hardship or advantage to any person. 23 Sec. 52. Section 427.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 427.9 Suspension of taxes, assessments, and rates or charges, 26 including interest, fees, and costs. 27 If a person is a recipient of federal supplementary security 28 income or state supplementary assistance, as defined in 29 section 249.1 , or is a resident of a health care facility, as 30 defined by section 135C.1 , which is receiving payment from 31 the department of health and human services for the personâs 32 care, the person shall be deemed to be unable to contribute to 33 the public revenue. The director of health and human services 34 shall notify a person receiving such assistance of the tax 35 -36- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 36/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ suspension provision and shall provide the person with evidence 1 to present to the appropriate county board of supervisors which 2 shows the personâs eligibility for tax suspension on parcels 3 owned, possessed, or upon which the person is paying taxes 4 as a purchaser under contract. The board of supervisors so 5 notified, without the filing of a petition and statement as 6 specified in section 427.8 , shall order the county treasurer to 7 suspend the collection of all the taxes, special assessments, 8 and rates or charges, including interest, fees, and costs, 9 assessed against the parcels and remaining unpaid by the person 10 or contractually payable by the person, for such time as the 11 person remains the owner or contractually prospective owner 12 of the parcels, and during the period the person receives 13 assistance as described in this section . The county board of 14 supervisors shall annually send to the department of health 15 and human services the names and social security numbers of 16 persons receiving a tax suspension pursuant to this section . 17 The department shall verify the continued eligibility for tax 18 suspension of each name on the list and shall return the list 19 to the board of supervisors. The director of health and human 20 services shall advise the person that the person may apply for 21 an additional property tax credit pursuant to sections 425.16 22 through 425.37 which shall be credited against the amount of 23 the taxes suspended. 24 Sec. 53. Section 435.22, subsection 1, paragraph b, 25 subparagraphs (2) and (3), Code 2026, are amended to read as 26 follows: 27 (2) For purposes of this paragraph âbâ , âincomeâ means 28 income as defined in section 425.17, subsection 7 , Code 2026, 29 and âbase yearâ means the calendar year preceding the year 30 in which the claim for a reduced rate of tax is filed. The 31 home reduced rate of tax shall only be allowed on the home in 32 which the claimant is residing at the time the claim for a 33 reduced rate of tax is filed or was residing at the time of the 34 claimantâs death in the case of a claim filed on behalf of a 35 -37- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 37/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ deceased claimant by the claimantâs legal guardian, spouse, or 1 attorney, or by the executor or administrator of the claimantâs 2 estate. 3 (3) Beginning with the 1998 base year, the income dollar 4 amounts set forth in this paragraph âbâ shall be multiplied 5 by the cumulative adjustment factor for that base year as 6 determined in section 425.23, subsection 4 , Code 2026 . 7 Sec. 54. Section 435.22, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 8 by striking the subsection. 9 Sec. 55. Section 435.26, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 a. A mobile home or manufactured home which is located 12 outside a manufactured home community or mobile home park shall 13 be converted to real estate by being placed on a permanent 14 foundation and shall be assessed for real estate taxes. A 15 home, after conversion to real estate, is eligible for the 16 homestead tax exemption and credit and the military service 17 tax exemption as provided in chapter 425, subchapter I , and 18 section 426A.11 . A taxable mobile home or manufactured home 19 which is located outside of a manufactured home community or 20 mobile home park as of January 1, 1995, is also exempt from the 21 permanent foundation requirements of this chapter until the 22 home is relocated. 23 Sec. 56. Section 435.26A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 3. After the surrender of a manufactured homeâs certificate 26 of title under this section , the manufactured home shall 27 continue to be taxed under section 435.22 and is not eligible 28 for the homestead tax exemption and credit or the military 29 service tax exemption and credit. A foreclosure action on a 30 manufactured home whose title has been surrendered under this 31 section shall be conducted as a real estate foreclosure. A tax 32 lien and its priority shall remain the same on a manufactured 33 home after its certificate of title has been surrendered. 34 Sec. 57. Section 441.21, subsection 1, paragraph i, 35 -38- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 38/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 (4) By January 1 of the assessment year following 2 the calendar year in which the plan was submitted to the 3 department, the conference board shall submit a report to the 4 department indicating that the plan of action was followed and 5 compliance has been achieved. The department may conduct a 6 field inspection to ensure that the assessor is in compliance. 7 By January 31, the department shall notify the assessor and the 8 conference board, by restricted certified mail, either that 9 compliance has been achieved or that the assessor remains in 10 noncompliance. If the department determines that the assessor 11 remains in noncompliance, the department shall take steps 12 to withhold up to five percent of the reimbursement payment 13 authorized in section 425.1 until the department of revenue 14 determines that the assessor is in compliance. 15 Sec. 58. Section 441.73, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 4. The executive council shall transfer for the fiscal year 18 beginning July 1, 1992, and each fiscal year thereafter, from 19 funds the fund established in sections 425.1 and section 426.1 , 20 an amount necessary to pay litigation expenses. The amount of 21 the fund for each fiscal year shall not exceed seven hundred 22 thousand dollars. The executive council shall determine 23 annually the proportionate amounts to be transferred from the 24 two separate funds. At any time when no litigation is pending 25 or in progress the balance in the litigation expense fund shall 26 not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. Any excess moneys 27 shall be transferred in a proportionate amount back to the 28 funds from which they were originally transferred. 29 Sec. 59. Section 483A.24, subsection 20, Code 2026, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 20. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted 32 pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime trout fishing 33 license, the department shall issue a lifetime trout fishing 34 license to a person who is at least sixty-five years of age or 35 -39- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 39/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ to a person who qualifies for the disabled veteran homestead 1 credit exemption as a disabled veteran under section 425.15 2 425.1 . The department shall prepare an application to be used 3 by a person requesting a lifetime trout fishing license under 4 this subsection . 5 Sec. 60. REPEAL. Sections 425.1A, 425.9, 425.15, 425.19, 6 425.20, 425.21, 425.24, 425.28, 425.33, 425.34, 425.35, 425.36, 7 425.39, 425.40, and 435.33, Code 2026, are repealed. 8 Sec. 61. ELDERLY AND DISABLED RENT REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM ââ 9 APPROPRIATION. 10 1. The department of health and human services shall 11 establish and administer a program for the reimbursement of 12 rent constituting property taxes paid, as defined in section 13 425.17, subsection 9, Code 2026, for rents paid by eligible 14 claimants in calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 15 2027. The department shall administer the program under the 16 provisions of chapter 425, subchapter II, Code 2026, including 17 determinations of eligibility and calculations of reimbursement 18 amounts, as if the program under that subchapter and any rules 19 adopted to implement or administer the program were in effect. 20 2. There is appropriated for fiscal years beginning on or 21 after July 1, 2026, from the general fund of the state to the 22 department of health and human services, an amount necessary to 23 establish and administer the program under subsection 1. 24 Sec. 62. IMPLEMENTATION ââ ADDITIONAL LEGISLATION. 25 Following the effective date of this division of this Act, the 26 department of revenue shall review other provisions of law to 27 determine if additional changes are necessary to implement 28 this division of this Act and, if necessary, shall submit 29 legislation to the ways and means committees of the senate and 30 house of representatives not later than January 1, 2027. 31 Sec. 63. SAVINGS PROVISION. This division of the Act does 32 not affect the operation of, or prohibit the application of, 33 prior provisions of the Code sections amended by this division 34 of this Act, or rules adopted under chapter 17A to administer 35 -40- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 40/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ such prior provisions, for assessment years beginning before 1 January 1, 2026, for property taxes due and payable in fiscal 2 years beginning before July 1, 2027, or for reimbursement of 3 rent constituting property taxes paid for amounts paid by the 4 claimant in calendar years beginning before January 1, 2027, 5 including appropriations made therefor. 6 Sec. 64. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 7 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 8 after January 1, 2026, for property taxes due and payable in 9 fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2027. 10 DIVISION IV 11 SECURE AN ADVANCED VISION FOR EDUCATION FUND ââ EQUITY TRANSFER 12 PERCENTAGE 13 Sec. 65. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 14 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 (b) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 17 2020, but before July 1, 2026, the equity transfer percentage 18 is equal to the equity transfer percentage for the immediately 19 preceding fiscal year, unless the amount of moneys available 20 in the secure an advanced vision for education fund in the 21 immediately preceding fiscal year equals or exceeds one hundred 22 two percent of the amount of moneys available in the fund for 23 the fiscal year prior to the immediately preceding fiscal year, 24 in which case the equity transfer percentage shall be the 25 equity transfer percentage for the immediately preceding fiscal 26 year plus one percent subject to the limitation in subparagraph 27 division (c). 28 Sec. 66. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 29 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2026, is 30 amended by striking the subparagraph division and inserting in 31 lieu thereof the following: 32 (c) (i) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the 33 equity transfer percentage is fifteen percent. 34 (ii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, the equity 35 -41- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 41/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ transfer percentage is twenty percent. 1 (iii) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, the equity 2 transfer percentage is twenty-five percent. 3 (iv) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, and each 4 fiscal year thereafter, the equity transfer percentage is 5 thirty percent. 6 Sec. 67. SCHOOL DISTRICT FUNDING RECONCILIATION. 7 For amounts allocated under section 423F.2 for fiscal 8 years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, the department of 9 management shall adjust or reconcile actual amounts to be 10 received by school districts in the fiscal year immediately 11 following the fiscal year during which the revenues were 12 collected. 13 DIVISION V 14 PROPERTY PARCEL INFORMATION 15 Sec. 68. Section 331.510, Code 2026, is amended by adding 16 the following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. An annual report not later 18 than January 1 to the department of management containing 19 parcel-level property data, including parcel identification 20 information, location, size, valuation, classification, types 21 of structures and improvements, exemptions, credits, historical 22 amounts of property taxes due and payable, and whether the 23 parcel is subject to a division of revenue. 24 b. In addition to the information required under paragraph 25 âaâ , the department of management may require additional 26 parcel-level data deemed necessary by the director of the 27 department of management. The department shall prescribe the 28 form and manner of submitting the annual report under this 29 subsection. 30 DIVISION VI 31 URBAN RENEWAL AND URBAN REVITALIZATION 32 Sec. 69. Section 403.2, Code 2026, is amended by striking 33 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 34 403.2 Declaration of policy. 35 -42- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 42/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ It is hereby found and declared that the powers conferred 1 by this chapter are for public uses and public purposes for 2 which public moneys may be expended and for which the power 3 of eminent domain, to the extent authorized, and police power 4 exercised; and that the necessity in the public interest for 5 the provisions herein enacted is hereby declared as a matter 6 of legislative determination. 7 Sec. 70. Section 403.3, Code 2026, is amended by striking 8 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 9 403.3 Municipal program. 10 The local governing body of a municipality may formulate for 11 the municipality a workable program for utilizing appropriate 12 private and public resources to eliminate slums and prevent 13 the development or spread of slums and urban blight and to 14 encourage needed urban rehabilitation. 15 Sec. 71. Section 403.5, subsection 2, paragraph b, 16 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 (1) Prior to its approval of an urban renewal plan which 18 provides for a division of revenue pursuant to section 403.19 , 19 the municipality shall mail the proposed plan by regular mail 20 to the affected taxing entities. The municipality shall 21 include with the proposed plan notification of a consultation 22 to be held between the municipality and affected taxing 23 entities prior to the public hearing on the urban renewal plan. 24 If For urban renewal plans and projects approved before the 25 effective date of this division of this Act, if the proposed 26 urban renewal plan or proposed urban renewal project within the 27 urban renewal area includes the use of taxes resulting from a 28 division of revenue under section 403.19 for a public building, 29 including but not limited to a police station, fire station, 30 administration building, swimming pool, hospital, library, 31 recreational building, city hall, or other public building 32 that is exempt from taxation, including the grounds of, and 33 the erection, equipment, remodeling, or reconstruction of, and 34 additions or extensions to, such a building, the municipality 35 -43- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 43/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ shall include with the proposed plan notification an analysis 1 of alternative development options and funding for the urban 2 renewal area or urban renewal project and the reasons such 3 options would be less feasible than the proposed urban renewal 4 plan or proposed urban renewal project. A copy of the analysis 5 required in this subparagraph shall be included with the urban 6 renewal report required under section 331.403 or 384.22 , as 7 applicable, and filed by December 1 following adoption of the 8 urban renewal plan or project. 9 Sec. 72. Section 403.5, subsection 4, paragraph b, 10 subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 The urban renewal plan conforms to the general plan of the 13 municipality as a whole; provided, that for urban renewal 14 plans and projects approved before the effective date of this 15 division of this Act, if the urban renewal area consists of an 16 area of open land to be acquired by the municipality, such area 17 shall not be so acquired except: 18 Sec. 73. Section 403.6, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 19 is amended to read as follows: 20 The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally 21 interpreted to achieve the purposes of this chapter . Every 22 Subject to the limitations for urban renewal projects under 23 section 403.17, subsection 25, every municipality shall 24 have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out 25 and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter , 26 including the following powers in addition to others herein 27 granted: 28 Sec. 74. Section 403.9, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 1. A Subject to the limitations of section 403.18A, a 31 municipality shall have power to periodically issue bonds in 32 its discretion to pay the costs of carrying out the purposes 33 and provisions of this chapter , including but not limited to 34 the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for 35 -44- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 44/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ surveys and planning, and the payment of interest on bonds, 1 authorized under this chapter , not to exceed three years from 2 the date the bonds are issued. The municipality shall have 3 power to issue refunding bonds for the payment or retirement 4 of such bonds previously issued by the municipality , subject 5 to the limitations of section 403.18A . Said bonds shall be 6 payable solely from the income and proceeds of the fund and 7 portion of taxes referred to in section 403.19, subsection 2 , 8 and revenues and other funds of the municipality derived from 9 or held in connection with the undertaking and carrying out of 10 urban renewal projects under this chapter . The municipality 11 may pledge to the payment of the bonds the fund and portion 12 of taxes referred to in section 403.19, subsection 2 , and may 13 further secure the bonds by a pledge of any loan, grant, or 14 contribution from the federal government or other source in aid 15 of any urban renewal projects of the municipality under this 16 chapter , or by a mortgage of any such urban renewal projects, 17 or any part thereof, title which is vested in the municipality. 18 Sec. 75. Section 403.12, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 19 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking 21 or carrying out of an urban renewal project , subject to 22 the limitations for urban renewal projects under section 23 403.17, subsection 25, located within the area in which it is 24 authorized to act, any public body may, upon such terms, with 25 or without consideration, as it may determine: 26 Sec. 76. Section 403.17, subsection 25, Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 25. a. âUrban renewal projectâ For urban renewal projects 29 approved before the effective date of this division of this 30 Act, âurban renewal projectâ may include undertakings and 31 activities of a municipality in an urban renewal area for 32 the elimination and for the prevention of the development or 33 spread of slums and blight, may include the designation and 34 development of an economic development area in an urban renewal 35 -45- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 45/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ area, and may involve slum clearance and redevelopment in an 1 urban renewal area, or rehabilitation or conservation in an 2 urban renewal area, or any combination or part thereof in 3 accordance with an urban renewal program. The undertakings and 4 activities may include: 5 a. (1) Acquisition of a slum area, blighted area, economic 6 development area, or portion of the areas; 7 b. (2) Demolition and removal of buildings and 8 improvements; 9 c. (3) Installation, construction, or reconstruction of 10 streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements 11 necessary for carrying out in the urban renewal area the urban 12 renewal objectives of this chapter in accordance with the urban 13 renewal plan; 14 d. (4) Disposition of any property acquired in the urban 15 renewal area, including sale, initial leasing, or retention 16 by the municipality itself, at its fair value for uses in 17 accordance with the urban renewal plan; 18 e. (5) Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or 19 compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other 20 improvements in accordance with the urban renewal plan; 21 f. (6) Acquisition of any other real property in the 22 urban renewal area, where necessary to eliminate unhealthful, 23 insanitary, or unsafe conditions, or to lessen density, 24 eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public 25 welfare, or otherwise to remove or prevent the spread of 26 blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public 27 facilities; 28 g. (7) Sale and conveyance of real property in furtherance 29 of an urban renewal project; 30 h. (8) Expenditure of proceeds of bonds issued before 31 October 7, 1986, for the construction of parking facilities on 32 city blocks adjacent to an urban renewal area. 33 b. For urban renewal projects approved on or after the 34 effective date of this division of this Act, âurban renewal 35 -46- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 46/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ projectâ shall include only the following undertakings and 1 activities: 2 (1) Acquisition of a portion of a property slum area, 3 blighted area, or economic development area to be used for the 4 installation, construction, or reconstruction of utilities 5 or streets that directly serve the area if the utilities or 6 streets are necessary for furtherance of the urban renewal 7 plan. 8 (2) Demolition and removal of buildings and improvements 9 located on the portion of property described in subparagraph 10 (1). 11 (3) Sale of public property within the urban renewal area 12 for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan. 13 Sec. 77. NEW SECTION . 403.18A Division of revenue 14 ordinances duration ââ limitations. 15 1. An ordinance providing for a division of revenue under 16 section 403.19 adopted before the effective date of this 17 division of this Act and that is not limited in duration under 18 section 403.17, subsection 10, or section 403.22, subsection 5, 19 shall be subject to the duration limitation in subsection 2. 20 2. a. A division of revenue ordinance described in 21 subsection 1 may continue in effect under this chapter until 22 such time that the urban renewal area is dissolved by the 23 municipality, the ordinance is repealed by the municipality, or 24 the ordinance terminates under the conditions of paragraph âcâ , 25 whichever occurs first. 26 b. A municipality shall not incur additional indebtedness 27 including loans, advances, and bonds, payable from the special 28 fund created in section 403.19 using revenue resulting from 29 the ordinance described under subsection 1 on or after the 30 effective date of this division of this Act. For the purposes 31 of this paragraph âbâ , the refinancing of indebtedness incurred 32 prior to the effective date of this division of this Act 33 shall not constitute an additional indebtedness, unless such 34 refinancing results in an increase in the amount of debt 35 -47- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 47/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ service that qualifies for payment from the special fund or 1 extends the term for payment or retirement of the indebtedness. 2 c. An ordinance described in subsection 1 providing for a 3 division of revenue shall terminate and be of no further force 4 and effect at the conclusion of the fiscal year during which 5 the retirement or payment of all indebtedness payable from such 6 division of revenue in existence on the effective date of this 7 division of this Act occurs. 8 d. An ordinance described in subsection 1 or any applicable 9 urban renewal area shall not be amended on or after the 10 effective date of this division of this Act to include 11 territory that is not subject to the ordinance on the effective 12 date of this division of this Act. 13 3. The duration limits under this section and the 14 limitations on the duration of ordinances providing for a 15 division of revenue under section 403.19, subsection 3A, shall 16 not apply to divisions of taxes established by community 17 colleges under chapter 260E or rural improvement zones under 18 chapter 357H. 19 4. The department of management may adopt rules pursuant to 20 chapter 17A necessary to implement and administer this section. 21 Sec. 78. Section 403.19, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 3. The portion of taxes mentioned in subsection 2 and the 24 special fund into which they shall be paid, may be irrevocably 25 pledged by a municipality for the payment of the principal and 26 interest on loans, advances, bonds issued under the authority 27 of section 403.9, subsection 1 , or indebtedness incurred by 28 a municipality to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, 29 the urban renewal project within the area. Costs of an urban 30 renewal project, including bonds, loans, advances, or other 31 indebtedness incurred on or after the effective date of this 32 division of this Act and payable from the special fund created 33 in subsection 2 shall only be paid from the portion of taxes 34 mentioned in subsection 2 resulting from that portion of the 35 -48- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 48/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ urban renewal area governed by the ordinance where the urban 1 renewal project is located. 2 Sec. 79. Section 403.19, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. An ordinance providing for a division 5 of revenue under this section that is adopted on or after the 6 effective date of this division of this Act shall be limited 7 to twenty years from the calendar year following the calendar 8 year in which the municipality first certifies to the county 9 auditor the amount of any loans, advances, indebtedness, or 10 bonds that qualify for payment from the division of revenue 11 provided for in this section. The ordinance shall terminate 12 and be of no further force and effect following the twenty-year 13 period provided in this subsection. 14 Sec. 80. Section 403.19, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 15 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Moneys from any source deposited into the 17 special fund created in this section shall not be expended for 18 or otherwise used in connection with an urban renewal project 19 approved on or after the effective date of this division of 20 this Act, that does not meet the definition of âurban renewal 21 projectâ under section 403.17, subsection 25, paragraph âbâ . 22 Sec. 81. Section 403.22, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 23 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 With respect to any urban renewal area established upon 25 the determination that the area is an economic development 26 area before the effective date of this division of this Act , a 27 division of revenue as provided in section 403.19 shall not be 28 allowed for the purpose of providing or aiding in the provision 29 of public improvements related to housing and residential 30 development, unless the municipality assures that the project 31 will include assistance for low and moderate income family 32 housing. 33 Sec. 82. Section 404.3D, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -49- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 49/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 404.3D Exemptions for residential property. 1 1. For revitalization areas established under this 2 chapter on or after July 1, 2024, and for first-year exemption 3 applications for property located in a revitalization area in 4 existence on July 1, 2024, filed on or after July 1, 2024, an 5 exemption authorized under this chapter for property that is 6 residential property shall not apply to property tax levies 7 imposed by a school district. 8 2. In addition to the inapplicability of the exemption to 9 school district property tax levies specified under subsection 10 1, for property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning 11 on or after July 1, 2027, if such a property receiving an 12 exemption is located in both a revitalization area and an 13 urban renewal area, the school district property taxes on the 14 property shall not be subject to the division of revenue under 15 section 403.19 and when collected shall be paid to the school 16 district. 17 Sec. 83. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 18 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19 DIVISION VII 20 ASSESSMENT FREQUENCY AND PROCEDURES 21 Sec. 84. Section 427A.1, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 9. The assessing authority shall annually reassess property 24 which is assessed and taxed as real property, but which would 25 be regarded as personal property except for this section , 26 on the same schedule as the reassessment schedule for real 27 property . This section shall not be construed to limit the 28 assessing authorityâs powers to assess or reassess under other 29 provisions of law. 30 Sec. 85. Section 428.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 1. Property shall be assessed for taxation each year. Real 33 estate shall be listed and assessed in 1981 2025 and every two 34 three years thereafter. The assessment of real estate shall 35 -50- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 50/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ be the value of the real estate as of January 1 of the year of 1 the assessment. The year 1981 2025 and each odd-numbered third 2 year thereafter shall be a reassessment year. In any year, the 3 two assessment years immediately after the reassessment year in 4 which an assessment has been made of all the real estate in an 5 assessing jurisdiction, the assessor shall value and assess or 6 revalue and reassess, as the case may require, any real estate 7 that the assessor finds was incorrectly valued or assessed, or 8 was not listed, valued, and assessed, in the assessment year 9 immediately preceding, also any real estate the assessor finds 10 has changed in value subsequent to January 1 of the preceding 11 real estate assessment year. However, a percentage increase 12 on a class of property shall not be made in a year not subject 13 to an equalization order unless ordered by the department of 14 revenue. The assessor shall determine the actual value and 15 compute the taxable value thereof as of January 1 of the year 16 of the revaluation and reassessment. The assessment shall be 17 completed as specified in section 441.28 , but no reduction or 18 increase in actual value shall be made for prior years. If an 19 assessor makes a change in the valuation of the real estate as 20 provided for, sections 441.23 , 441.37 , 441.37A , 441.37B , and 21 441.38 apply. 22 Sec. 86. Section 441.21, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 3. a. âActual valueâ , âtaxable valueâ , or âassessed 25 valueâ as used in other sections of the Code in relation to 26 assessment of property for taxation shall mean the valuations 27 as determined by this section ; however, other provisions of 28 the Code providing special methods or formulas for assessing 29 or valuing specified property shall remain in effect, but this 30 section shall be applicable to the extent consistent with such 31 provisions. The assessor and department of revenue shall 32 disclose at the written request of the taxpayer all information 33 in any formula or method used to determine the actual value of 34 the taxpayerâs property. In addition, for assessment years 35 -51- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 51/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ beginning on or after January 1, 2027, if the taxpayerâs 1 property has increased in actual value by fifteen percent or 2 more from the immediately preceding reassessment year under 3 section 428.4, or the most recent assessment year following 4 such reassessment year if the property was revalued or 5 reassessed in that assessment year, the assessor shall provide 6 the taxpayer with a statement of the reasons for the increase 7 in actual value, information specifying the portion of actual 8 value increase attributable to a change in classification, 9 revaluation, new construction, improvements, or renovations to 10 the property, and all information in any formula or method used 11 to determine the actual value. 12 b. (1) For assessment years beginning before January 13 1, 2018, the burden of proof shall be upon any complainant 14 attacking such valuation as excessive, inadequate, inequitable, 15 or capricious. However, in protest or appeal proceedings when 16 the complainant offers competent evidence by at least two 17 disinterested witnesses that the market value of the property 18 is less than the market value determined by the assessor, the 19 burden of proof thereafter shall be upon the officials or 20 persons seeking to uphold such valuation to be assessed. 21 (2) (1) For assessment years beginning on or after January 22 1, 2018, the Except as provided in subparagraph (3), the burden 23 of proof shall be upon any complainant attacking such valuation 24 as excessive, inadequate, inequitable, or capricious. However, 25 in protest or appeal proceedings when the complainant offers 26 competent evidence that the market value of the property is 27 different than the market value determined by the assessor, 28 the burden of proof thereafter shall be upon the officials or 29 persons seeking to uphold such valuation to be assessed. 30 (3) (2) If the classification of a property has been 31 previously adjudicated by the property assessment appeal board 32 or a court as part of an appeal under this chapter , there 33 is a presumption that the classification of the property has 34 not changed for each of the four subsequent assessment years, 35 -52- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 52/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ unless a subsequent such adjudication of the classification of 1 the property has occurred, and the burden of demonstrating a 2 change in use shall be upon the person asserting a change to 3 the propertyâs classification. 4 (3) For assessment years beginning on or after January 5 1, 2027, if the taxpayerâs property actual value increased 6 by fifteen percent or more from the immediately preceding 7 reassessment year under section 428.4, or the most recent 8 assessment year following such reassessment year if the 9 property was revalued or reassessed in that assessment year, 10 including an increase as the result of an equalization order, 11 and the property did not change classification or primary use 12 and the increase in actual value is not the result of new 13 construction, improvements, or renovations to the property, the 14 actual value so determined by the assessor is not presumed to 15 be the actual value and in any protest or appeal the assessor 16 shall have the burden of proof that the valuation is not 17 excessive, inadequate, inequitable, or capricious. 18 Sec. 87. Section 441.23, Code 2026, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 441.23 Notice Periodic assessment ââ notice of valuation. 21 1. The periodic assessment and reassessment of property 22 shall be determined as provided in section 428.4. 23 2. If there has been an increase or decrease in the 24 valuation of the property, or upon the written request of the 25 person assessed, the assessor shall, at the time of making the 26 assessment, inform the person assessed, in writing, of the 27 valuation put upon the taxpayerâs property, and notify the 28 person, that if the person feels aggrieved, to contact the 29 assessor pursuant to section 441.30 or to appear before the 30 board of review and show why the assessment should be changed. 31 However, if the valuation of a class of property is uniformly 32 decreased, the assessor may notify the affected property owners 33 by publication in the official newspapers of the county. The 34 owners of real property shall be notified not later than April 35 -53- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 53/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 1 of any adjustment of the real property assessment. 1 Sec. 88. Section 441.26, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. The notice in each odd-numbered equalization year , as 4 determined under section 441.49, shall contain a statement 5 that the assessments are subject to equalization pursuant to 6 an order issued by the department of revenue, that the county 7 auditor shall give notice on or before October 8 by publication 8 in an official newspaper of general circulation to any class of 9 property affected by the equalization order, that the county 10 auditor shall give notice by mail postmarked on or before 11 October 8 to each property owner or taxpayer whose valuation 12 has been increased by the equalization order, and that the 13 board of review shall be in session from October 10 to November 14 15 to hear protests of affected property owners or taxpayers 15 whose valuations have been adjusted by the equalization order. 16 Sec. 89. Section 441.28, Code 2026, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 441.28 Assessment rolls ââ change ââ notice to taxpayer. 19 The Subject to section 428.4, the assessment shall be 20 completed not later than April 1 each year. If the assessor 21 makes any change in an assessment after it has been entered 22 on the assessorâs rolls, the assessor shall note on the roll, 23 together with the original assessment, the new assessment 24 and the reason for the change, together with the assessorâs 25 signature and the date of the change. Provided, however, in 26 the event the assessor increases any assessment the assessor 27 shall give notice of the increase in writing to the taxpayer 28 by mail postmarked no later than April 1. No changes shall be 29 made on the assessment rolls after April 1 except by written 30 agreement of the taxpayer and assessor under section 441.30 , 31 by order of the board of review or of the property assessment 32 appeal board, or by decree of court. 33 Sec. 90. Section 441.33, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 34 following new subsection: 35 -54- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 54/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Ex parte communications with board of 1 review members are prohibited in protests before the board. 2 Sec. 91. Section 441.35, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 2. In any year either of the two years after the year in 5 which an assessment has been made of all of the real estate 6 in any taxing district as determined under section 428.4 , the 7 board of review shall meet as provided in section 441.33 , and 8 where the board finds the same has changed in value, the board 9 shall revalue and reassess any part or all of the real estate 10 contained in such taxing district, and in such case, the board 11 shall determine the actual value as of January 1 of the year 12 of the revaluation and reassessment and compute the taxable 13 value thereof. If the assessment of any such property is 14 raised, or any property is added to the tax list by the board, 15 the clerk shall give notice in the manner provided in section 16 441.36 . If all property in any taxing district is revalued and 17 reassessed, the board shall, in addition to notices required to 18 be provided in the manner specified in section 441.36 , instruct 19 the clerk to give immediate notice by one publication in one 20 of the official newspapers located in the taxing district. 21 The decision of the board as to the foregoing matters shall 22 be subject to appeal to the property assessment appeal board 23 within the same time and in the same manner as provided in 24 section 441.37A and to the district court within the same time 25 and in the same manner as provided in section 441.38 . 26 Sec. 92. Section 441.47, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 27 is amended to read as follows: 28 The department of revenue on or about August 15, 1977 29 2027 , and every two three years thereafter shall order the 30 equalization of the levels of assessment of each class of 31 property in the several assessing jurisdictions by adding to 32 or deducting from the valuation of each class of property such 33 percentage in each case as may be necessary to bring the same 34 to its taxable value as fixed in this chapter , chapters 427 35 -55- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 55/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ through 440 , and chapter 443 . The department shall adjust to 1 actual value the valuation of any class of property as set out 2 in the abstract of assessment when the valuation is at least 3 five percent above or below actual value as determined by the 4 department. For purposes of such value adjustments and before 5 such equalization the director shall adopt, in the manner 6 prescribed by chapter 17A , such rules as may be necessary to 7 determine the level of assessment for each class of property in 8 each county. The rules shall cover: 9 Sec. 93. Section 441.49, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 a. On or before October 8 the county auditor shall cause 12 to be published in official newspapers of general circulation 13 the final equalization order. The county auditor shall also 14 notify each property owner or taxpayer whose valuation has been 15 increased by the final equalization order by mail postmarked on 16 or before October 8. The publication and the individual notice 17 mailed to each property owner or taxpayer whose valuation has 18 been increased shall include, in type larger than the remainder 19 of the publication or notice, the following statements: 20 Assessed values are equalized by the department of revenue 21 every two three years. Local taxing authorities determine 22 the final tax levies and may reduce property tax rates to 23 compensate for any increase in valuation due to equalization. 24 If you are not satisfied that your assessment as adjusted by 25 the equalization order is correct, you may file a protest 26 against such assessment with the board of review on or after 27 October 9, to and including October 31. 28 Sec. 94. IMPLEMENTATION ââ ADDITIONAL LEGISLATION. 29 Following the effective date of this division of this Act, 30 the department of revenue shall review other provisions 31 of law to determine if additional changes are necessary to 32 implement the change in timing of periodic assessments enacted 33 in this division of this Act and, if necessary, shall submit 34 legislation to the ways and means committees of the senate and 35 -56- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 56/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ house of representatives not later than January 1, 2027. 1 DIVISION VIII 2 LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHARED-SERVICES GRANT PROGRAM 3 Sec. 95. NEW SECTION . 28E.20 Local government 4 shared-services grant program. 5 1. A local government shared-services grant fund is 6 created and established as a separate and distinct fund in the 7 state treasury under the control of the economic development 8 authority. For purposes of this section, âlocal governmentâ 9 means a county, city, township, or any special-purpose district 10 or authority. 11 2. a. In addition to moneys deposited in the local 12 government shared-services grant fund pursuant to 13 appropriations made by the general assembly, the economic 14 development authority may accept gifts, grants, bequests, 15 and other private contributions, as well as state or federal 16 funds, and shall deposit the moneys in the fund to be used for 17 purposes of this section. Moneys in the fund are appropriated 18 to the economic development authority and shall be used only 19 to provide grants to local governments to assist in efforts to 20 consolidate government positions and pursue agreements with 21 other local governments to share services and reduce the use of 22 property tax revenues for such shared services. Grant funds 23 may be used by the local government for costs to implement 24 service-sharing or service-consolidation initiatives and 25 transitional or temporary costs of eliminating services. 26 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 27 that remain unawarded at the close of the fiscal year shall 28 not revert but shall remain in the fund for expenditure in 29 succeeding fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 30 subsection 2, interest earned on moneys in the local government 31 shared-services grant fund shall be credited to the fund. 32 3. The economic development authority shall adopt rules to 33 establish and administer the grant program to provide for the 34 allocation of moneys in the fund in the form of competitive 35 -57- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 57/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ grants to local governments in accordance with the purposes 1 and objectives of this section. The rules adopted by the 2 economic development authority shall specify the eligibility 3 of applicants, eligible services and items for grant funding, 4 the electronic application process, and the maximum award per 5 grant. 6 DIVISION IX 7 FIRSTHOME IOWA ACCOUNTS 8 Sec. 96. NEW SECTION . 12L.1 FirstHome Iowa program ââ 9 purpose and definitions. 10 1. The general assembly finds that the general welfare and 11 well-being of the state are directly related to homeownership 12 of the citizens of the state, and that a vital and valid 13 public purpose is served by the creation and implementation 14 of programs which encourage and make possible the attainment 15 of homeownership by the greatest number of citizens of the 16 state. The general welfare of the citizens of the state will 17 be enhanced by establishing a FirstHome Iowa program which 18 allows citizens of the state to invest money in a public trust 19 for future application to the payment of qualified homebuyer 20 expenses. The creation of the means of encouragement for 21 citizens to invest in such a program represents the carrying 22 out of a vital and valid public purpose. In order to make 23 available to the citizens of the state an opportunity to fund 24 future first-time homeownership, it is necessary that a public 25 trust be established in which moneys may be invested for future 26 use. 27 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 28 requires: 29 a. âAdministrative fundâ means the administrative fund 30 established under section 12L.4. 31 b. âBeneficiaryâ means the individual designated by a 32 participation agreement to benefit from advance payments of 33 qualified homebuyer expenses on behalf of the beneficiary. 34 c. âFirst-time homebuyerâ means an individual who is a 35 -58- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 58/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ resident of Iowa and who does not own, either individually or 1 jointly, a single-family or multifamily residence, and who 2 has not owned or purchased, either individually or jointly, a 3 single-family or multifamily residence for a period of three 4 years prior to the date of the qualified purchase for which the 5 eligible home costs are paid or reimbursed from an account. 6 d. âIndividualâ means a natural person. 7 e. âFirstHome Iowa program trustâ or âtrustâ means the trust 8 created under section 12L.2. 9 f. âFirstHome Iowa program trust accountâ or âaccountâ 10 means an account within the trust that was established for 11 the purpose of paying or reimbursing a beneficiaryâs eligible 12 qualified homebuyer expenses in connection with a qualified 13 purchase. 14 g. âParticipantâ means an individual, individualâs legal 15 representative, trust, or estate that has entered into a 16 participation agreement under this chapter, either individually 17 or jointly with the individualâs spouse, for the advance 18 payment of qualified homebuyer expenses on behalf of a 19 beneficiary. 20 h. âParticipation agreementâ means an agreement between a 21 participant and the trust entered into under this chapter. 22 i. âProgram fundâ means the program fund established under 23 section 12L.4. 24 j. âQualified homebuyer expensesâ means any of the 25 following: 26 (1) A down payment or closing costs for the qualified 27 purchase of a single-family residence in Iowa that is the 28 principal residence of the beneficiary if such beneficiary is a 29 first-time homebuyer with respect to such purchase. 30 (2) A cost, fee, tax, or payment incurred by, or charged 31 or assigned to, a beneficiary as part of the purchase under 32 subparagraph (1) and listed on the statement of receipts and 33 disbursements for the sale, including any statement prescribed 34 by 12 C.F.R. Â§1026.38, as amended. 35 -59- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 59/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ (3) Any United States veterans administration funding 1 fee incurred by, or charged or assigned to, a beneficiary in 2 connection with a veterans administration home loan guaranty 3 program. 4 k. âQualified purchaseâ means the purchase of a 5 single-family residence in Iowa by the accountâs beneficiary 6 ninety or more days after the date the participant first opened 7 the account. 8 l. âResidentâ means the same as defined in section 422.4. 9 m. âSingle-family residenceâ means a single-family 10 residence owned and occupied by a beneficiary as the 11 beneficiaryâs principal residence, including but not limited 12 to a manufactured home, mobile home, condominium unit, or 13 cooperative. 14 Sec. 97. NEW SECTION . 12L.2 Creation of FirstHome Iowa 15 program trust. 16 A FirstHome Iowa program trust is created. The treasurer of 17 state is the trustee of the trust, and has all powers necessary 18 to carry out and effectuate the purposes, objectives, and 19 provisions of this chapter pertaining to the trust, including 20 the power to do all of the following: 21 1. Make and enter into contracts necessary for the 22 administration of the trust created under this chapter. 23 2. Enter into agreements with any financial institution, 24 the state, or any federal or other state agency, or other 25 entity as required to implement this chapter. 26 3. Carry out the duties and obligations of the trust 27 pursuant to this chapter. 28 4. Accept any grants, gifts, legislative appropriations, 29 and other moneys from the state, any unit of federal, state, or 30 local government, or any other person, firm, partnership, or 31 corporation which the treasurer of state shall deposit into the 32 administrative fund or the program fund. 33 5. Carry out studies and projections so the treasurer of 34 state may advise participants regarding present and estimated 35 -60- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 60/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ future qualified homebuyer expenses and levels of financial 1 participation in the trust required in order to enable 2 participants to achieve their qualifying purchase objectives. 3 6. Participate in any federal, state, or local governmental 4 program for the benefit of the trust. 5 7. Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the 6 property, assets, or activities of the trust. 7 8. Enter into participation agreements with participants. 8 9. Make payments to or on behalf of beneficiaries for 9 qualified homebuyer expenses pursuant to participation 10 agreements. 11 10. Make refunds to participants upon the termination 12 of participation agreements, and partial nonqualified 13 distributions to participants, pursuant to the provisions, 14 limitations, and restrictions set forth in this chapter. 15 11. Invest moneys from the program fund in any investments 16 which are determined by the treasurer of state to be 17 appropriate. 18 12. Engage investment advisors, if necessary, to assist in 19 the investment of trust assets. 20 13. Contract for goods and services and engage personnel 21 as necessary, including consultants, actuaries, managers, 22 legal counsel, and auditors for the purpose of rendering 23 professional, managerial, and technical assistance and advice 24 to the treasurer of state regarding trust administration and 25 operation. 26 14. Establish, impose, and collect administrative fees 27 and charges in connection with transactions of the trust for 28 deposit in the administrative fund and provide for reasonable 29 service charges. 30 15. Administer the funds of the trust. 31 16. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the 32 administration of the trust. 33 Sec. 98. NEW SECTION . 12L.3 Participation agreements for 34 trust. 35 -61- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 61/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ The trust may enter into participation agreements with 1 participants on behalf of beneficiaries pursuant to the 2 following terms and agreements: 3 1. Each participation agreement may require a participant 4 to agree to invest a specific amount of money in the trust 5 for a specific period of time for the benefit of a specific 6 beneficiary. A participant shall not be required to make an 7 annual contribution on behalf of a beneficiary. The maximum 8 contribution that may be deducted for Iowa income tax purposes 9 shall be the amount contributed by the participant during the 10 applicable tax year, not to exceed five thousand five hundred 11 dollars per beneficiary per year adjusted annually to reflect 12 increases in the consumer price index. 13 2. The execution of a participation agreement by the 14 trust shall not guarantee in any way that qualified homebuyer 15 expenses will be equal to projections and estimates provided by 16 the trust or that the beneficiary named in any participation 17 agreement will qualify for a mortgage, home loan, or other 18 forms of credit for a qualified purchase. 19 3. a. A beneficiary under a participation agreement may be 20 changed as permitted under rules adopted by the treasurer of 21 state upon written request of the participant as long as the 22 substitute beneficiary is eligible for participation. 23 b. Participation agreements may otherwise be freely amended 24 throughout their terms in order to enable participants to 25 increase or decrease the level of participation, change the 26 designation of beneficiaries, and carry out similar matters as 27 authorized by rule. 28 4. Each participation agreement shall provide that the 29 participation agreement may be canceled upon the terms and 30 conditions, and upon payment of applicable fees and costs set 31 forth and contained in the rules adopted by the treasurer of 32 state. 33 5. A participant may designate a successor in accordance 34 with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. The designated 35 -62- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 62/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ successor shall succeed to the ownership of the account in 1 the event of the death of the participant. In the event a 2 participant dies and has not designated a successor to the 3 account, the following criteria shall apply: 4 a. The beneficiary of the account, if eighteen years of 5 age or older, shall become the owner of the account as well as 6 remain the beneficiary upon filing the appropriate forms in 7 accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. 8 b. If the beneficiary of the account is under the age of 9 eighteen, account ownership shall be transferred to the first 10 surviving parent or other legal guardian of the beneficiary to 11 file the appropriate forms in accordance with rules adopted by 12 the treasurer of state. 13 Sec. 99. NEW SECTION . 12L.4 FirstHome Iowa program and 14 administrative funds ââ investment and payments. 15 1. a. The treasurer of state shall segregate moneys 16 received by the trust into two funds: the FirstHome Iowa 17 program fund and the administrative fund to be used for 18 administration of the program. 19 b. All moneys paid by participants in connection with 20 participation agreements shall be deposited as received into 21 separate accounts within the program fund. 22 c. Contributions to the trust made by participants may only 23 be made in the form of cash. 24 d. A participant or beneficiary may, directly or indirectly, 25 direct the investment of any contributions to the trust or any 26 earnings thereon no more than four times in a calendar year. 27 2. Moneys accrued by participants in the program fund of the 28 trust may be used for payments to or on behalf of a beneficiary 29 for qualified homebuyer expenses. 30 Sec. 100. NEW SECTION . 12L.5 Cancellation of agreements. 31 A participant may cancel a participation agreement at will. 32 Upon cancellation of a participation agreement, a participant 33 shall be entitled to the return of the participantâs account 34 balance. 35 -63- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 63/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 101. NEW SECTION . 12L.6 Ownership of payments and 1 investment income ââ transfer of ownership rights. 2 1. a. A participant retains ownership of all payments 3 made under a participation agreement up to the date of 4 utilization for payment of qualified homebuyer expenses for the 5 beneficiary. 6 b. All income derived from the investment of the payments 7 made by the participant shall be considered to be held in trust 8 for the benefit of the beneficiary. 9 2. In the event the FirstHome Iowa program is terminated 10 prior to payment of qualified homebuyer expenses for the 11 beneficiary, the participant is entitled to a refund of the 12 participantâs account balance. 13 3. Any amounts which may be paid to any person or persons 14 pursuant to the FirstHome Iowa program trust but which are not 15 listed in this section are owned by the trust. 16 4. A participant may transfer ownership rights to another 17 participant or may transfer funds to another account under the 18 trust. The transfer shall be made and the property distributed 19 in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state or 20 with the terms of the participation agreement. 21 5. A participant shall not be entitled to utilize any 22 interest in the trust as security for a loan. 23 Sec. 102. NEW SECTION . 12L.7 Annual audited financial 24 report to governor and general assembly. 25 1. a. The treasurer of state shall submit an annual 26 audited financial report, prepared in accordance with generally 27 accepted accounting principles, on the operations of the trust 28 by November 1 to the governor and the general assembly. 29 b. The annual audit shall be made either by the auditor 30 of state or by an independent certified public accountant 31 designated by the auditor of state and shall include direct and 32 indirect costs attributable to the use of outside consultants, 33 independent contractors, and any other persons who are not 34 state employees. 35 -64- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 64/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. The annual audit shall be supplemented by all of the 1 following information prepared by the treasurer of state: 2 a. Any related studies or evaluations prepared in the 3 preceding year. 4 b. A summary of the benefits provided by the trust including 5 the number of participants and beneficiaries in the trust. 6 c. Any other information which is relevant in order to make 7 a full, fair, and effective disclosure of the operations of the 8 trust. 9 Sec. 103. NEW SECTION . 12L.8 Tax considerations. 10 State income tax treatment of the FirstHome Iowa program 11 trust shall be as provided in section 422.7, subsections 46 and 12 47. 13 Sec. 104. NEW SECTION . 12L.9 Property rights to assets in 14 trust. 15 1. The assets of the trust shall at all times be preserved, 16 invested, and expended solely and only for the purposes of 17 the trust and shall be held in trust for the participants and 18 beneficiaries. 19 2. No property rights in the trust shall exist in favor of 20 the state. 21 3. The assets of the trust shall not be transferred or used 22 by the state for any purposes other than the purposes of the 23 trust. 24 Sec. 105. NEW SECTION . 12L.10 Construction. 25 This chapter shall be construed liberally in order to 26 effectuate its purpose. 27 Sec. 106. Section 12G.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 28 following new subsection: 29 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Create strategies for coordination of 30 the program with the FirstHome Iowa program trust established 31 in chapter 12L. 32 Sec. 107. Section 232D.503, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 33 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A FirstHome Iowa program trust account 35 -65- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 65/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ established for the minor pursuant to chapter 12L. 1 Sec. 108. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsections: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. a. Subtract the contribution that may 4 be deducted for Iowa income tax purposes as a participant in 5 the FirstHome Iowa program trust pursuant to section 12L.3, 6 subsection 1. For purposes of this paragraph, a participant 7 who makes a contribution on or before the date prescribed in 8 section 422.21 for making and filing an individual income tax 9 return, excluding extensions, or the date for making and filing 10 an individual income tax return determined by the director 11 pursuant to an order issued under section 421.17, subsection 12 30, may elect to be deemed to have made the contribution on the 13 last day of the preceding calendar year. The director, after 14 consultation with the treasurer of state, shall prescribe by 15 rule the manner and method by which a participant may make an 16 election authorized by the preceding sentence. 17 b. Add the amount resulting from the cancellation of 18 a participation agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a 19 participant in the FirstHome Iowa program trust to the extent 20 previously deducted as a contribution to the trust. 21 c. Add, to the extent previously deducted as a contribution 22 to the trust, the amount resulting from a withdrawal or 23 transfer made by the taxpayer from the FirstHome Iowa program 24 trust for purposes other than the payment of qualified 25 homebuyer expenses. 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 47. Subtract, to the extent included, 27 income from interest and earnings received from the FirstHome 28 Iowa program trust created in chapter 12L. 29 Sec. 109. Section 541B.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding 30 the following new subsections: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Withdrawal for deposit into FirstHome 32 Iowa program trust account. First-time homebuyer account 33 balances under this chapter may be withdrawn without penalty or 34 taxation in this state if such withdrawal is deposited in an 35 -66- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 66/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ account within the FirstHome Iowa program trust under chapter 1 12L within thirty days of the withdrawal. The treasurer of 2 state may by rule provide for the direct transfer of moneys 3 within an account under this chapter to a FirstHome Iowa 4 program trust account and such transfer shall not be subject to 5 penalty or taxation in this state. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. No new accounts. New accounts shall not 7 be established under this chapter on or after July 1, 2026. 8 Sec. 110. Section 627.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 18. The debtorâs interest, whether as 11 participant or beneficiary, in contributions and assets, 12 including the accumulated earnings and market increases in 13 value, held in an account in the FirstHome Iowa program trust 14 organized under chapter 12L. 15 Sec. 111. Section 633.108, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 16 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. A FirstHome Iowa program trust account 18 established for the minor pursuant to chapter 12L. 19 Sec. 112. Section 633.555, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 20 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 21 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. An account owner or participant under 22 a FirstHome Iowa program trust account established for the 23 protected person pursuant to chapter 12L. 24 Sec. 113. Section 633.678, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 25 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. An account owner or participant under 27 a FirstHome Iowa program trust account established for the 28 protected person pursuant to chapter 12L. 29 Sec. 114. Section 633.681, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 30 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. An account owner or participant under 32 a FirstHome Iowa program trust account established for the 33 protected person pursuant to chapter 12L. 34 Sec. 115. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to 35 -67- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 67/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ contributions made under chapter 12L on or after July 1, 2026, 1 for tax years ending on or after that date: 2 The section of this division of this Act enacting section 3 422.7, subsections 46 and 47. 4 DIVISION X 5 PROPERTY ASSESSMENT SYSTEM TASK FORCE 6 Sec. 116. PROPERTY TAX ASSESSMENT PROCESS STUDY ââ REPORT. 7 1. By January 1, 2027, the department of revenue shall 8 prepare and submit a report, including any recommended changes, 9 to the general assembly regarding the assessment of property in 10 this state for taxation purposes, including but not limited to 11 review of all of the following: 12 a. Assessor qualifications and education. 13 b. Assessor selection and retention. 14 c. Functions of conference boards and examining boards. 15 d. Property assessment procedures, frequency, and 16 timelines. 17 e. Property tax assessment protest and appeal procedures 18 and burdens of proof. 19 2. The department may convene a task force of local and 20 state officials and technical experts to assist in the review 21 undertaken pursuant to subsection 1. 22 DIVISION XI 23 COUNTY OFFICERS ââ APPOINTMENT IN LIEU OF ELECTION 24 Sec. 117. Section 39.17, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 39.17 County officers. 27 1. There shall be elected in each county at the general 28 election to be held in the year 1976 and every four years 29 thereafter, an auditor and a sheriff, each to hold office for a 30 term of four years. 31 2. There shall be elected in each county at the general 32 election to be held in 1974 and each four years thereafter, a 33 treasurer, a recorder, and a county attorney who shall each 34 hold office for a term of four years. 35 -68- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 68/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 118. Section 43.24, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Objections filed with the commissioner shall be 3 considered by three elected county officers whose eligibility 4 is not in question. The chairperson of the board of 5 supervisors shall appoint the three elected officers unless 6 the chairperson is ineligible, in which case, the appointments 7 shall be made by the county auditor. In either case, a 8 majority vote shall decide the issue. 9 Sec. 119. Section 44.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 44.7 Hearing before commissioner. 12 Except as otherwise provided in section 44.8 , objections 13 filed with the commissioner shall be considered by the county 14 auditor, county treasurer, and county attorney, and a majority 15 decision shall be final. However, if the objection is to the 16 certificate of nomination of one or more of the above named 17 county officers the county attorney , the officer or officers 18 objected to county attorney shall not pass upon the objection, 19 but their places the county attorneyâs place shall be filled , 20 respectively, by the chairperson of the board of supervisors, 21 the sheriff, and the county recorder. Objections relating to 22 incorrect or incomplete information for information that is 23 required under section 44.3 shall be sustained. 24 Sec. 120. Section 331.321, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 25 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0x. A county auditor in accordance with 27 section 331.501. 28 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00x. A county treasurer in accordance with 29 section 331.551. 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . 000x. A county recorder in accordance with 31 section 331.601. 32 Sec. 121. Section 331.324, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 6. In carrying out the requirement of section 331.322, 35 -69- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 69/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subsection 1 , the board may purchase an individual or a blanket 1 surety bond insuring the fidelity of county officers and county 2 employees who are accountable for county funds or property 3 subject to the minimum surety bond requirements of chapter 4 64 . An elected A county officer is deemed to have furnished 5 surety if the officer is covered by a blanket bond purchased 6 as provided in this subsection . 7 Sec. 122. Section 331.501, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 331.501 Office of county auditor. 10 1. The office of auditor is an elective appointed office 11 except that if a vacancy occurs in the office, a successor 12 shall be elected or appointed to the unexpired term as provided 13 in chapter 69 . The auditor shall be appointed by the board as 14 provided in section 331.321. 15 2. A person elected or appointed to the office of auditor 16 shall qualify by taking the oath of office as provided in 17 section 63.10 and giving bond as provided in section 64.8 . 18 3. The term of office of the auditor is four years unless 19 removed pursuant to section 331.321 . The term of office shall 20 commence on the first day in January which is not a Sunday or 21 holiday and continue for four years or until a successor is 22 appointed and qualifies as provided in this section. A vacancy 23 shall be filled by the board for the unexpired term. 24 Sec. 123. Section 331.551, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 331.551 Office of county treasurer. 27 1. The office of treasurer is an elective appointed office 28 except that if a vacancy occurs in the office, a successor 29 shall be elected or appointed to the unexpired term as provided 30 in chapter 69 . The treasurer shall be appointed by the board 31 as provided in section 331.321. 32 2. A person elected or appointed to the office of treasurer 33 shall qualify by taking the oath of office as provided in 34 section 63.10 and give bond as provided in section 64.10 . 35 -70- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 70/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 3. The term of office of the treasurer is four years unless 1 removed pursuant to section 331.321 . The term of office shall 2 commence on the first day in January which is not a Sunday or 3 holiday and continue for four years or until a successor is 4 appointed and qualifies as provided in this section. A vacancy 5 shall be filled by the board for the unexpired term. 6 Sec. 124. Section 331.601, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 331.601 Office of county recorder. 9 1. The office of recorder is an elective appointed office 10 except that if a vacancy occurs in the office, a successor 11 shall be elected or appointed to the unexpired term as provided 12 in chapter 69 . The recorder shall be appointed by the board as 13 provided in section 331.321. 14 2. A person elected or appointed to the office of recorder 15 shall qualify by taking the oath of office as provided in 16 section 63.10 and giving bond as provided in section 64.8 . 17 3. The term of office of the recorder is four years unless 18 removed pursuant to section 331.321 . The term of office shall 19 commence on the first day in January which is not a Sunday or 20 holiday and continue for four years or until a successor is 21 appointed and qualifies as provided in this section. A vacancy 22 shall be filled by the board for the unexpired term. 23 4. In counties in which the office of county recorder has 24 been abolished, the board of supervisors shall reassign the 25 duties of the county recorder who also serves as the county 26 registrar pursuant to chapter 144 . 27 Sec. 125. Section 331.902, subsections 2, 3, and 5, Code 28 2026, are amended to read as follows: 29 2. Each elective officer specified in subsection 1 shall 30 maintain a record in the county system of each fee and charge 31 collected. The record shall show the date, amount, payor, 32 and type of service, and, when the fee is for recording an 33 instrument, the names of the parties to the instrument. The 34 record of the fees collected shall be retained for three years 35 -71- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 71/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ after audit of the county pursuant to section 11.6 . 1 3. Each elective officer specified in subsection 1 shall 2 make a quarterly report to the board showing, by type, the fees 3 collected during the preceding quarter. The officer shall pay 4 at least quarterly to the county treasury the fees and charges 5 collected, except for the county auditorâs transfer fees, which 6 shall be paid directly to the county treasurer by the county 7 recorder. The officer shall receive a receipt and maintain 8 a record of the date and amount of each payment into the 9 county treasury. This subsection does not apply to the county 10 treasurer if the county treasurer credits the fees daily to the 11 county treasury and reports the receipts on the monthly report 12 to the auditor and the board of supervisors. 13 5. Each elective officer specified in subsection 1 shall 14 retain overpayments of fees and other charges paid to the 15 county in an amount of five dollars or less, unless the payor 16 has requested a refund of the overpayment. 17 Sec. 126. Section 331.907, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 331.907 Compensation schedule ââ preparation and adoption. 20 1. The annual compensation of the auditor, treasurer, 21 recorder, sheriff, county attorney, and supervisors shall 22 be determined as provided in this section . The county 23 compensation board annually shall review the compensation 24 paid to comparable officers in other counties of this state, 25 other states, private enterprise, and the federal government. 26 In setting the salary of the county sheriff, the county 27 compensation board shall set the sheriffâs salary so that it 28 is comparable to salaries paid to professional law enforcement 29 administrators and command officers of the state patrol, 30 the division of criminal investigation of the department of 31 public safety, and city police chiefs employed by cities of 32 similar population to the population of the county. The county 33 compensation board shall prepare a compensation schedule for 34 the elected specified county officers for the succeeding 35 -72- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 72/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ fiscal year. The county compensation board shall provide 1 documentation to the board of supervisors that demonstrates 2 how the county compensation board determined the recommended 3 compensation schedule, including by providing the applicable 4 compensation information for comparable officers in other 5 counties of this state, other states, private enterprise, and 6 the federal government. A recommended compensation schedule 7 requires a majority vote of the membership of the county 8 compensation board. 9 2. At the public hearing held on the county budget as 10 provided in section 331.434 , the county compensation board 11 shall submit its recommended compensation schedule for the 12 next fiscal year to the board of supervisors for inclusion in 13 the county budget. The board of supervisors shall review the 14 recommended compensation schedule for the elected specified 15 county officers and determine the final compensation schedule. 16 In determining the final compensation schedule for the elected 17 specified county officers, the board of supervisors may set 18 compensation at less than the compensation provided in the 19 current compensation schedule if the position is reduced to 20 part-time under the recommended compensation schedule. A copy 21 of the final compensation schedule shall be filed with the 22 county budget at the office of the director of the department 23 of management. The final compensation schedule takes effect 24 on July 1 following its adoption by the board of supervisors. 25 For purposes of this subsection , âcurrent compensation scheduleâ 26 means the compensation schedule in effect when the board of 27 supervisors considers the recommended compensation schedule. 28 3. The board of supervisors may adopt a decrease in 29 compensation paid to supervisors irrespective of the county 30 compensation boardâs recommended compensation schedule or other 31 approved changes in compensation paid to other elected county 32 officers. A decrease in compensation paid to supervisors shall 33 be adopted by the board of supervisors no less than thirty days 34 before the county budget is certified under section 24.17 . 35 -73- LSB 5407XL (12) 91 md/jh 73/ 90 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 4. The elected specified county officers are also entitled 1 to receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in 2 performance of official duties of their respective offices. 3 The board of supervisors may authorize the reimbursement of 4 expenses related to an educational course, seminar, or school 5 which is attended by a county officer after the county officer 6 is elected or appointed , but prior to the county officer taking 7 office. 8 5. In counties having two courthouses, a principal elected 9 county officer and the principal officerâs first deputy or 10 assistant may agree in writing to a division of their annual 11 salaries. The division shall not allow for payment to the 12 elected officer and the first deputy or assistant which is 13 greater than the sum of the two salaries otherwise authorized 14 by law. Upon certification to the board by the elected officer 15 involved, the board shall certify to the auditor the annual 16 salaries certified by the elected officer. 17 Sec. 127. CURRENT COUNTY OFFICE HOLDERS. 18 The term of office of each county auditor, county treasurer, 19 and county recorder holding such office on the effective date 20 of this division of this Act shall continue until expiration 21 of the current elective term. After expiration of such term 22 or vacancy in such office occurring prior to expiration, such 23 office shall be filled by appointment by the county board of 24 supervisors as provided in this division of this Act. 25 Sec. 128. IMPLEMENTATION ââ ADDITIONAL LEGISLATION. 26 Following the effective date of this division of this Act, 27 the secretary of state shall review other provisions of law 28 to determine if additional legislative changes are necessary 29 to implement the changes in this division of this Act and, if 30 necessary, shall submit legislation to the local government 31 committees of the senate and house of representatives not later 32 than January 1, 2027. 33